673 | shrink (verb): to become smaller, like clothes washed too hot | loc: küçülmek
  EN TS: Her sweater shrank. A lot!
  tr TS: Kazağı küçüldü. Hem de nasıl!
  EN FS: Her scarf shrank. A lot!
  tr FS: Atkısı küçüldü. Hem de nasıl!
  EN TP: a shrunken red sweater
  tr TP: küçülmüş kırmızı kazak
  EN FP: shrinking back in fear
  tr FP: korkudan geri çekilmek
674 | sick (adjective): ill, not feeling well | loc: hasta
  EN TS: She is sick and at home.
  tr TS: Hasta ve evde.
  EN FS: She is sick and at work.
  tr FS: Hasta ve işte.
  EN TP: sick on the sofa
  tr TP: kanepede hasta
  EN FP: sick in a hospital bed
  tr FP: hastane yatağında hasta
675 | side (noun): the left or right part of something | loc: yan
  EN TS: One side of the boat is done.
  tr TS: Teknenin bir yanı bitti.
  EN FS: One side of the house is done.
  tr FS: Evin bir yanı bitti.
  EN TP: painting the boat's side
  tr TP: teknenin yanını boyamak
  EN FP: the side of a lake
  tr FP: gölün bir yanı
676 | sightseeing (noun): visiting a city's famous places as a tourist | loc: şehir turu
  EN TS: They're sightseeing in Venice.
  tr TS: Venedik'te şehir turu yapıyorlar.
  EN FS: They're sightseeing in Paris.
  tr FS: Paris'te şehir turu yapıyorlar.
  EN TP: sightseeing by gondola
  tr TP: gondolla şehir turu
  EN FP: sightseeing by bus
  tr FP: otobüsle şehir turu
678 | silk (noun): smooth shiny cloth made from worm threads | loc: ipek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The silk refuses to stay.
  tr TS: İpek yerinde durmayı reddediyor.
  EN FS: The cat refuses to stay.
  tr FS: Kedi yerinde durmayı reddediyor.
  EN TP: shiny green silk
  tr TP: parlak yeşil ipek
  EN FP: a silk tie
  tr FP: ipek bir kravat
679 | silver (noun): a shiny grey precious metal | loc: gümüş
  EN TS: The silver is shining again!
  tr TS: Gümüş yine parlıyor!
  EN FS: The gold is shining again!
  tr FS: Altın yine parlıyor!
  EN TP: polishing old silver
  tr TP: eski gümüşleri parlatmak
  EN FP: silver paint on a car
  tr FP: arabada gümüş boya
680 | singer (noun): a person whose job is to perform songs | loc: şarkıcı
  EN TS: The singer is having fun.
  tr TS: Şarkıcı keyif yapıyor.
  EN FS: The singer is having lunch.
  tr FS: Şarkıcı öğle yemeği yiyor.
  EN TP: a singer in a studio
  tr TP: stüdyoda bir şarkıcı
  EN FP: a singer on stage
  tr FP: sahnede bir şarkıcı
681 | singing (noun): making music with your voice | loc: şarkı söylemek
  EN TS: Singing loudly in the car!
  tr TS: Arabada avaz avaz şarkı söylemek!
  EN FS: Singing loudly in the shower!
  tr FS: Duşta avaz avaz şarkı söylemek!
  EN TP: singing along in a car
  tr TP: arabada şarkı söylemek
  EN FP: singing on a stage
  tr FP: sahnede şarkı söylemek
683 | sink (noun): a basin with a tap for washing things | loc: evye
  EN TS: The sink is a foam mountain!
  tr TS: Evye köpük dağına döndü!
  EN FS: The bath is a foam mountain!
  tr FS: Küvet köpük dağına döndü!
  EN TP: a sink full of foam
  tr TP: köpük dolu bir evye
  EN FP: a sink full of toys
  tr FP: oyuncak dolu bir evye
684 | sister (noun): a girl or woman with the same parents as you | loc: kız kardeş
  EN TS: Her sister is finally home!
  tr TS: Kız kardeşi sonunda evde!
  EN FS: Her brother is finally home!
  tr FS: Erkek kardeşi sonunda evde!
  EN TP: hugging her sister
  tr TP: kız kardeşine sarılmak
  EN FP: fighting with her sister
  tr FP: kız kardeşiyle kavga etmek
685 | size (noun): how big or small something is | loc: beden
  EN TS: Finally, the right size.
  tr TS: Sonunda doğru beden.
  EN FS: Finally, the right shoes.
  tr FS: Sonunda doğru ayakkabı.
  EN TP: the right hat size
  tr TP: doğru şapka bedeni
  EN FP: the right shoe size
  tr FP: doğru ayakkabı numarası
687 | skateboard (noun): a short board with four wheels you ride on | loc: kaykay
  EN TS: Skateboard at sunset? So cool.
  tr TS: Gün batımında kaykay? Çok havalı.
  EN FS: Bicycle at sunset? So cool.
  tr FS: Gün batımında bisiklet? Çok havalı.
  EN TP: riding a skateboard
  tr TP: kaykay sürmek
  EN FP: a skateboard in a shop
  tr FP: dükkânda bir kaykay
688 | skin (noun): the outer layer that covers your body | loc: cilt
  EN TS: She takes care of her skin.
  tr TS: Cildine iyi bakıyor.
  EN FS: She takes care of her dog.
  tr FS: Köpeğine iyi bakıyor.
  EN TP: putting cream on her skin
  tr TP: cildine krem sürmek
  EN FP: washing her skin with soap
  tr FP: cildini sabunla yıkamak
689 | skirt (noun): a piece of clothing that hangs down from the waist | loc: etek
  EN TS: Great skirt, great spin!
  tr TS: Harika etek, harika dönüş!
  EN FS: Great hat, great spin!
  tr FS: Harika şapka, harika dönüş!
  EN TP: a yellow pleated skirt
  tr TP: sarı pliseli etek
  EN FP: a long black skirt
  tr FP: uzun siyah etek
690 | sky (noun): the space above the earth where you see clouds | loc: gökyüzü
  EN TS: The sky is so big.
  tr TS: Gökyüzü ne kadar büyük.
  EN FS: The sea is so big.
  tr FS: Deniz ne kadar büyük.
  EN TP: looking up at the sky
  tr TP: gökyüzüne bakmak
  EN FP: a sky full of stars
  tr FP: yıldız dolu gökyüzü
691 | guard (verb): to watch over something so nobody takes it | loc: korumak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is guarding his car. Badly.
  tr TS: Arabasını koruyor. Pek beceremeden.
  EN FS: He is washing his car. Badly.
  tr FS: Arabasını yıkıyor. Pek beceremeden.
  EN TP: guarding a parked car
  tr TP: park halindeki arabayı korumak
  EN FP: guarding a bank
  tr FP: bir bankayı korumak
692 | sleeping (noun): the state of resting with your eyes closed | loc: uyumak
  EN TS: Sleeping? He is a pro.
  tr TS: Uyumak mı? Adam profesyonel.
  EN FS: Reading? He is a pro.
  tr FS: Okumak mı? Adam profesyonel.
  EN TP: sleeping under a blanket
  tr TP: battaniyenin altında uyumak
  EN FP: sleeping in a tent
  tr FP: çadırda uyumak
693 | sleepy (adjective): tired and ready to fall asleep | loc: uykulu
  EN TS: Just five more minutes. So sleepy.
  tr TS: Beş dakika daha. Çok uykuluyum.
  EN FS: Just five more minutes. So awake.
  tr FS: Beş dakika daha. Çok zindeyim.
  EN TP: a sleepy night ride
  tr TP: uykulu bir gece yolculuğu
  EN FP: a sleepy morning class
  tr FP: uykulu bir sabah dersi
694 | slice (verb): to cut something into thin flat pieces | loc: dilimlemek
  EN TS: He is slicing a tomato.
  tr TS: Domates dilimliyor.
  EN FS: He is slicing a cucumber.
  tr FS: Salatalık dilimliyor.
  EN TP: to slice a tomato thin
  tr TP: domatesi ince dilimlemek
  EN FP: to slice a cake
  tr FP: pasta dilimlemek
695 | smiling (noun): the act of turning up the corners of your mouth | loc: gülümsemek
  EN TS: Soon everyone is smiling.
  tr TS: Az sonra herkes gülümsüyor.
  EN FS: Soon everyone is crying.
  tr FS: Az sonra herkes ağlıyor.
  EN TP: smiling on a ferry
  tr TP: vapurda gülümsemek
  EN FP: smiling at the camera
  tr FP: kameraya gülümsemek
696 | smoke (noun): the grey cloud that rises from something burning | loc: duman
  EN TS: He is lost in the smoke!
  tr TS: Dumanın içinde kayboldu!
  EN FS: He is lost in the snow!
  tr FS: Karın içinde kayboldu!
  EN TP: a cloud of grey smoke
  tr TP: gri bir duman bulutu
  EN FP: smoke from a chimney
  tr FP: bacadan çıkan duman
697 | smoking (noun): breathing in from a lit cigarette | loc: sigara içmek
  EN TS: The smoking area is busy.
  tr TS: Sigara içme alanı kalabalık.
  EN FS: The smoking area is empty.
  tr FS: Sigara içme alanı bomboş.
  EN TP: smoking outside a bar
  tr TP: barın önünde sigara içmek
  EN FP: a no smoking sign
  tr FP: sigara içilmez tabelası
698 | smoothie (noun): a thick cold drink of blended fruit | loc: smoothie
  EN TS: The smoothie is so purple.
  tr TS: Smoothie resmen mor.
  EN FS: The smoothie is so green.
  tr FS: Smoothie resmen yeşil.
  EN TP: a thick berry smoothie
  tr TP: koyu orman meyveli smoothie
  EN FP: a green smoothie
  tr FP: yeşil bir smoothie
699 | smuggle (verb): to take something past a guard in secret | loc: kaçakçılık yapmak
  EN TS: He smuggled cheese past the guard!
  tr TS: Nöbetçinin burnunun dibinden peynir kaçakçılığı yaptı!
  EN FS: He smuggled wine past the guard!
  tr FS: Nöbetçinin burnunun dibinden şarap kaçakçılığı yaptı!
  EN TP: smuggling cheese in hay
  tr TP: samanın içinde peynir kaçakçılığı
  EN FP: smuggling cheese on a boat
  tr FP: teknede peynir kaçakçılığı
700 | snail (noun): a slow small animal that carries its shell | loc: salyangoz
  EN TS: The snail is in no hurry.
  tr TS: Salyangozun hiç acelesi yok.
  EN FS: The frog is in no hurry.
  tr FS: Kurbağanın hiç acelesi yok.
  EN TP: a snail on a leaf
  tr TP: yaprağın üstünde salyangoz
  EN FP: a snail on a plate
  tr FP: tabakta salyangoz
701 | snake (noun): a long animal with no legs that slides along | loc: yılan
  EN TS: The snake is on a black rock.
  tr TS: Yılan siyah bir kayanın üstünde.
  EN FS: The snake is on a white rock.
  tr FS: Yılan beyaz bir kayanın üstünde.
  EN TP: a snake in the sand
  tr TP: kumda bir yılan
  EN FP: a snake in the grass
  tr FP: çimenlerde bir yılan
702 | sneakers (noun): soft sports shoes with rubber soles | loc: spor ayakkabı
  EN TS: Sneakers on, stairs next.
  tr TS: Spor ayakkabılar giyildi, sıra merdivende.
  EN FS: Sandals on, stairs next.
  tr FS: Sandaletler giyildi, sıra merdivende.
  EN TP: lacing teal sneakers
  tr TP: petrol mavisi spor ayakkabı bağlamak
  EN FP: cleaning teal sneakers
  tr FP: petrol mavisi spor ayakkabı temizlemek
704 | sneeze (verb): to blow air out of your nose suddenly | loc: hapşırmak
  EN TS: He sneezed his hat off!
  tr TS: Hapşırınca şapkası uçtu!
  EN FS: He sneezed his shoe off!
  tr FS: Hapşırınca ayakkabısı uçtu!
  EN TP: sneezing at dandelions
  tr TP: karahindibalara hapşırmak
  EN FP: sneezing at a cat
  tr FP: bir kediye hapşırmak
705 | sneezing (noun): blowing air out of your nose suddenly | loc: hapşırmak
  EN TS: The sneezing never stops.
  tr TS: Hapşırması bir türlü bitmiyor.
  EN FS: The singing never stops.
  tr FS: Şarkı söylemesi bir türlü bitmiyor.
  EN TP: sneezing into her elbow
  tr TP: dirseğine hapşırmak
  EN FP: sneezing into a tissue
  tr FP: mendile hapşırmak
706 | snow (noun): soft white frozen flakes that fall in winter | loc: kar
  EN TS: Snow on the tongue? Yummy!
  tr TS: Dilinde kar? Nefis!
  EN FS: Rain on the tongue? Yummy!
  tr FS: Dilinde yağmur? Nefis!
  EN TP: catching snow on the tongue
  tr TP: diliyle kar yakalamak
  EN FP: clearing snow from a car
  tr FP: arabadaki karı temizlemek
707 | snowboard (noun): a wide board for sliding down slopes in winter | loc: snowboard
  EN TS: Cool orange snowboard, dude.
  tr TS: Havalı turuncu snowboard, kanka.
  EN FS: Cool blue snowboard, dude.
  tr FS: Havalı mavi snowboard, kanka.
  EN TP: strapping on a snowboard
  tr TP: snowboard'u ayağa bağlamak
  EN FP: a snowboard in a shop
  tr FP: dükkânda bir snowboard
708 | soap (noun): a bar or liquid you use with water to wash | loc: sabun
  EN TS: Muddy hands? Soap time!
  tr TS: Eller çamur mu? Sabun zamanı!
  EN FS: Muddy feet? Soap time!
  tr FS: Ayaklar çamur mu? Sabun zamanı!
  EN TP: a bar of soap
  tr TP: bir kalıp sabun
  EN FP: a bottle of soap
  tr FP: bir şişe sabun
710 | suds (noun): the white bubbles that soap makes in water | loc: köpük
  EN TS: A cloud of suds in her hands.
  tr TS: Ellerinde bir köpük bulutu.
  EN FS: A cloud of suds on her head.
  tr FS: Başında bir köpük bulutu.
  EN TP: a huge cloud of suds
  tr TP: kocaman bir köpük bulutu
  EN FP: suds in a washing machine
  tr FP: çamaşır makinesinde köpük
711 | socket (noun): the outlet in a wall where you plug things in | loc: priz | translator note: light bulb socket = duy in Turkish
  EN TS: Phone at 1%. Socket found!
  tr TS: Telefon %1. Priz bulundu!
  EN FS: Phone at 50%. Socket found!
  tr FS: Telefon %50. Priz bulundu!
  EN TP: a hidden wall socket
  tr TP: gizli bir duvar prizi
  EN FP: a light bulb socket
  tr FP: bir ampul duyu
712 | soda (noun): a sweet fizzy drink | loc: gazoz
  EN TS: He is scared of his soda.
  tr TS: Gazozundan korkuyor.
  EN FS: He is scared of his sandwich.
  tr FS: Sandviçinden korkuyor.
  EN TP: a can of orange soda
  tr TP: bir kutu portakallı gazoz
  EN FP: a glass of cola soda
  tr FP: bir bardak kola
713 | soil (noun): the dark earth that plants grow in | loc: toprak
  EN TS: Oh, hello! A worm in the soil!
  tr TS: Aa, merhaba! Toprakta bir solucan!
  EN FS: Oh, hello! A coin in the soil!
  tr FS: Aa, merhaba! Toprakta bir madeni para!
  EN TP: planting in dark soil
  tr TP: koyu toprağa dikim yapmak
  EN FP: soil on the carpet
  tr FP: halıda toprak
714 | soldier (noun): a person who fights in an army | loc: asker
  EN TS: The soldier is home again!
  tr TS: Asker yine evde!
  EN FS: The soldier is at sea again!
  tr FS: Asker yine denizde!
  EN TP: a soldier coming home
  tr TP: eve dönen bir asker
  EN FP: a soldier leaving home
  tr FP: evden ayrılan bir asker
715 | someone (noun): a person, but you do not know or say who | loc: biri
  EN TS: Someone left her a coffee.
  tr TS: Biri ona kahve bırakmış.
  EN FS: Someone left her a pizza.
  tr FS: Biri ona pizza bırakmış.
  EN TP: a note from someone
  tr TP: birinden gelen not
  EN FP: someone's birthday card
  tr FP: birinin doğum günü kartı
716 | soup spoon (noun): a big round spoon for eating hot liquid food | loc: çorba kaşığı
  EN TS: He eats with a soup spoon.
  tr TS: Çorba kaşığıyla yiyor.
  EN FS: He eats with chopsticks.
  tr FS: Yemek çubuklarıyla yiyor.
  EN TP: eating with a soup spoon
  tr TP: çorba kaşığıyla yemek
  EN FP: stirring with a soup spoon
  tr FP: çorba kaşığıyla karıştırmak
717 | soup (noun): a hot liquid food made from vegetables or meat | loc: çorba
  EN TS: The soup is burning hot!
  tr TS: Çorba cehennem gibi sıcak!
  EN FS: The soup is ice cold!
  tr FS: Çorba buz gibi soğuk!
  EN TP: hot tomato soup
  tr TP: sıcak domates çorbası
  EN FP: cold tomato soup
  tr FP: soğuk domates çorbası
718 | south (noun): the direction toward the bottom of a map | loc: güney
  EN TS: The geese are flying south.
  tr TS: Kazlar güneye uçuyor.
  EN FS: The geese are walking south.
  tr FS: Kazlar güneye yürüyor.
  EN TP: following the birds south
  tr TP: kuşları güneye takip etmek
  EN FP: driving south
  tr FP: güneye araba sürmek
719 | space (noun): the empty area beyond the sky, with stars | loc: uzay | translator note: space/parking-space pun does not travel
  EN TS: Wow, space is so empty!
  tr TS: Vay, uzay bomboş!
  EN FS: Wow, the sea is so empty!
  tr FS: Vay, deniz bomboş!
  EN TP: stars in space
  tr TP: uzayda yıldızlar
  EN FP: a parking space
  tr FP: boş bir park yeri
720 | spice (noun): a strong-tasting powder used to flavour food | loc: baharat
  EN TS: That spice is really strong.
  tr TS: Bu baharat gerçekten çok sert.
  EN FS: That spice is really green.
  tr FS: Bu baharat gerçekten çok yeşil.
  EN TP: red spice in a cone
  tr TP: külahta kırmızı baharat
  EN FP: a jar of dried spice
  tr FP: bir kavanoz kuru baharat
721 | spilling (noun): the act of letting liquid fall out by accident | loc: dökme | translator note: TS uses the verb form of dökme
  EN TS: She caused the spilling!
  tr TS: Her şeyi o döktü!
  EN FS: The boy caused the spilling!
  tr FS: Her şeyi çocuk döktü!
  EN TP: spilling a glass of water
  tr TP: bir bardak su dökmek
  EN FP: spilling a cup of coffee
  tr FP: bir fincan kahve dökmek
723 | spine (noun): the column of bones down the middle of the back | loc: omurga | translator note: book-spine pun does not travel
  EN TS: The doctor is showing him the spine, bone by bone.
  tr TS: Doktor ona omurgayı kemik kemik gösteriyor.
  EN FS: The doctor is showing him the skull, bone by bone.
  tr FS: Doktor ona kafatasını kemik kemik gösteriyor.
  EN TP: bones of the spine
  tr TP: omurganın kemikleri
  EN FP: the spine of a book
  tr FP: bir balığın omurgası
724 | splash (noun): water flying up when something hits it | loc: su sıçraması
  EN TS: Each splash gets bigger!
  tr TS: Her su sıçraması daha büyük!
  EN FS: Each splash gets smaller!
  tr FS: Her su sıçraması daha küçük!
  EN TP: a huge splash
  tr TP: kocaman bir su sıçraması
  EN FP: a splash of milk
  tr FP: bir süt sıçraması
726 | spring (noun): the season after winter when plants grow | loc: ilkbahar | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Spring is here, jacket off.
  tr TS: İlkbahar geldi, ceketler çıktı.
  EN FS: Winter is here, jacket off.
  tr FS: Kış geldi, ceketler çıktı.
  EN TP: spring under cherry trees
  tr TP: kiraz ağaçları altında ilkbahar
  EN FP: spring rain in the city
  tr FP: şehirde ilkbahar yağmuru
727 | sprint (verb): to run at full speed over a short distance | loc: sprint atmak
  EN TS: She sprinted to the finish!
  tr TS: Finişe sprint attı!
  EN FS: She walked to the finish!
  tr FS: Finişe yürüdü!
  EN TP: sprinting to the finish line
  tr TP: bitiş çizgisine sprint atmak
  EN FP: sprinting for the bus
  tr FP: otobüse sprint atmak
729 | squirrel (noun): a small tree animal with a big bushy tail | loc: sincap
  EN TS: The squirrel is planning for winter.
  tr TS: Sincap kış için plan yapıyor.
  EN FS: The rabbit is planning for winter.
  tr FS: Tavşan kış için plan yapıyor.
  EN TP: a squirrel with an acorn
  tr TP: palamutlu bir sincap
  EN FP: a squirrel with a pizza
  tr FP: pizzalı bir sincap
730 | staff (noun): all the people who work for a place | loc: personel
  EN TS: The staff are posing together.
  tr TS: Personel topluca poz veriyor.
  EN FS: The staff are eating together.
  tr FS: Personel topluca yemek yiyor.
  EN TP: restaurant staff at work
  tr TP: iş başında restoran personeli
  EN FP: staff on a train
  tr FP: trende personel
731 | stamp (noun): a small sticker you put on a letter to post it | loc: pul | translator note: passport-stamp pun does not travel (damga, not pul)
  EN TS: He is putting a stamp on it.
  tr TS: Üstüne pul koyuyor.
  EN FS: He is putting a coin on it.
  tr FS: Üstüne bozuk para koyuyor.
  EN TP: a stamp on an envelope
  tr TP: zarfın üstünde pul
  EN FP: a stamp in a passport
  tr FP: bir pul albümü
733 | state (noun): a country with its own government | loc: devlet
  EN TS: Two states signed a treaty.
  tr TS: İki devlet antlaşma imzaladı.
  EN FS: Three states signed a treaty.
  tr FS: Üç devlet antlaşma imzaladı.
  EN TP: two states signing a treaty
  tr TP: antlaşma imzalayan iki devlet
  EN FP: a state of chaos
  tr FP: kaos içinde bir devlet
734 | steak (noun): a thick slice of beef that you fry or grill | loc: biftek
  EN TS: The dog wants that steak.
  tr TS: Köpek o bifteği istiyor.
  EN FS: The cat wants that steak.
  tr FS: Kedi o bifteği istiyor.
  EN TP: a steak with pink inside
  tr TP: içi pembe bir biftek
  EN FP: a steak in the freezer
  tr FP: dondurucuda bir biftek
735 | steam (noun): the hot white cloud boiling water turns into | loc: buhar
  EN TS: Steam fogged up his glasses!
  tr TS: Buhar gözlüğünü buğuladı!
  EN FS: Rain fogged up his glasses!
  tr FS: Yağmur gözlüğünü buğuladı!
  EN TP: a cloud of steam
  tr TP: bir buhar bulutu
  EN FP: a cloud of smoke
  tr FP: bir duman bulutu
736 | stepbrother (noun): the son of your parent's new husband or wife | loc: üvey erkek kardeş
  EN TS: Hi, new stepbrother!
  tr TS: Selam, yeni üvey erkek kardeş!
  EN FS: Hi, new stepsister!
  tr FS: Selam, yeni üvey kız kardeş!
  EN TP: meeting a new stepbrother
  tr TP: yeni üvey erkek kardeşle tanışmak
  EN FP: fighting with a stepbrother
  tr FP: üvey erkek kardeşle kavga etmek
737 | stepfather (noun): the man married to your mother, not your dad | loc: üvey baba
  EN TS: Stepfather of the year fixed the bike.
  tr TS: Yılın üvey babası bisikleti tamir etti.
  EN FS: Stepfather of the year fixed the car.
  tr FS: Yılın üvey babası arabayı tamir etti.
  EN TP: a stepfather fixing a bike
  tr TP: bisiklet tamir eden üvey baba
  EN FP: a stepfather at a wedding
  tr FP: düğünde bir üvey baba
738 | sticky note (noun): a small square of paper you stick up as a reminder | loc: yapışkanlı not
  EN TS: He drew a heart on a sticky note.
  tr TS: Yapışkanlı nota bir kalp çizdi.
  EN FS: He drew a star on a sticky note.
  tr FS: Yapışkanlı nota bir yıldız çizdi.
  EN TP: a heart sticky note
  tr TP: kalpli yapışkanlı not
  EN FP: sticky notes on a screen
  tr FP: ekranda yapışkanlı notlar
739 | stop (verb): to end moving and stay still | loc: durmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He stopped for pizza. Rules are rules.
  tr TS: Pizza için durdu. Kural kuraldır.
  EN FS: He stopped for sushi. Rules are rules.
  tr FS: Suşi için durdu. Kural kuraldır.
  EN TP: to stop for pizza
  tr TP: pizza için durmak
  EN FP: to stop for petrol
  tr FP: benzin için durmak
740 | stopwatch (noun): a watch you start and stop to time something | loc: kronometre
  EN TS: The stopwatch must be broken!
  tr TS: Bu kronometre kesin bozuk!
  EN FS: The phone must be broken!
  tr FS: Bu telefon kesin bozuk!
  EN TP: clicking a stopwatch
  tr TP: kronometreye basmak
  EN FP: clicking a phone camera
  tr FP: telefon kamerasına basmak
741 | storm (noun): very bad weather with strong wind and rain | loc: fırtına
  EN TS: Big storm outside, tea inside.
  tr TS: Dışarıda koca fırtına, içeride çay.
  EN FS: Big sun outside, tea inside.
  tr FS: Dışarıda koca güneş, içeride çay.
  EN TP: watching a storm with tea
  tr TP: çay eşliğinde fırtınayı izlemek
  EN FP: walking in a storm
  tr FP: fırtınada yürümek
742 | stove (noun): a kitchen machine with burners for cooking | loc: ocak
  EN TS: All four stove burners are on.
  tr TS: Ocağın dört gözü de açık.
  EN FS: Only one stove burner is on.
  tr FS: Ocağın sadece bir gözü açık.
  EN TP: four burners on a stove
  tr TP: ocakta dört göz
  EN FP: a small camping stove
  tr FP: küçük bir kamp ocağı
743 | straight (adjective): not bent or curved, in a direct line | loc: düz
  EN TS: The road is totally straight.
  tr TS: Yol tamamen düz.
  EN FS: The road is totally curvy.
  tr FS: Yol tamamen virajlı.
  EN TP: a straight row of bricks
  tr TP: düz bir sıra tuğla
  EN FP: a straight answer
  tr FP: düz bir cevap
744 | stranger (noun): a person you do not know at all | loc: yabancı
  EN TS: She met a stranger with an umbrella.
  tr TS: Şemsiyeli bir yabancıyla tanıştı.
  EN FS: She met a stranger with a big dog.
  tr FS: Kocaman köpekli bir yabancıyla tanıştı.
  EN TP: a stranger with an umbrella
  tr TP: şemsiyeli bir yabancı
  EN FP: a stranger with a bike
  tr FP: bisikletli bir yabancı
746 | stream (noun): a small narrow river running through land | loc: dere
  EN TS: They are jumping the stream!
  tr TS: Dereyi atlıyorlar!
  EN FS: They are jumping the fence!
  tr FS: Çiti atlıyorlar!
  EN TP: jumping over a stream
  tr TP: derenin üstünden atlamak
  EN FP: swimming in a stream
  tr FP: derede yüzmek
747 | stress (noun): mental pressure from having too much to do | loc: stres
  EN TS: It's just a little stress.
  tr TS: Sadece birazcık stres.
  EN FS: It's just a little rain.
  tr FS: Sadece birazcık yağmur.
  EN TP: stress at the office
  tr TP: ofiste stres
  EN FP: stress at the gym
  tr FP: spor salonunda stres
749 | stretch (verb): to pull your body long to loosen your muscles | loc: esnemek
  EN TS: They are stretching together.
  tr TS: Birlikte esneme yapıyorlar.
  EN FS: They are dancing together.
  tr FS: Birlikte dans ediyorlar.
  EN TP: to stretch before running
  tr TP: koşudan önce esnemek
  EN FP: to stretch a rubber band
  tr FP: bir lastiği germek
750 | string (noun): a thin cord for tying things | loc: ip
  EN TS: The string holds the box securely.
  tr TS: İp kutuyu sımsıkı tutuyor.
  EN FS: The string holds the bag securely.
  tr FS: İp çantayı sımsıkı tutuyor.
  EN TP: a box tied with string
  tr TP: iple bağlanmış kutu
  EN FP: a guitar string
  tr FP: bir gitar teli
751 | style (noun): your own way of dressing and looking | loc: stil
  EN TS: Matching? Not her style.
  tr TS: Uyumlu kombin mi? Onun stili değil.
  EN FS: Purple boots? Not her style.
  tr FS: Mor bot mu? Onun stili değil.
  EN TP: her own bold style
  tr TP: kendine has cesur stili
  EN FP: a style of music
  tr FP: bir müzik stili
752 | sugar (noun): sweet white grains you add to food and drinks | loc: şeker
  EN TS: Sugar saved her coffee!
  tr TS: Kahvesini şeker kurtardı!
  EN FS: Milk saved her coffee!
  tr FS: Kahvesini süt kurtardı!
  EN TP: sugar in black coffee
  tr TP: sade kahvede şeker
  EN FP: sugar on a cake
  tr FP: pastanın üstünde şeker
753 | suit (noun): a jacket and trousers that match | loc: takım elbise
  EN TS: That blue suit fits him well.
  tr TS: O mavi takım elbise ona çok yakışıyor.
  EN FS: That grey suit fits him well.
  tr FS: O gri takım elbise ona çok yakışıyor.
  EN TP: trying on a blue suit
  tr TP: mavi takım elbise denemek
  EN FP: washing a blue suit
  tr FP: mavi takım elbise yıkamak
754 | support (verb): to hold someone up and help them succeed | loc: desteklemek
  EN TS: Her friend is supporting her.
  tr TS: Arkadaşı onu destekliyor.
  EN FS: Her friend is ignoring her.
  tr FS: Arkadaşı onu görmezden geliyor.
  EN TP: supporting her friend
  tr TP: arkadaşını desteklemek
  EN FP: supporting a football team
  tr FP: bir futbol takımını desteklemek
755 | surface (noun): the flat top layer of something you can touch | loc: yüzey
  EN TS: Every surface here is smooth.
  tr TS: Buradaki her yüzey pürüzsüz.
  EN FS: Every surface here is rough.
  tr FS: Buradaki her yüzey pürüzlü.
  EN TP: a smooth shiny surface
  tr TP: pürüzsüz parlak bir yüzey
  EN FP: a surface full of scratches
  tr FP: çizik dolu bir yüzey
756 | surfboard (noun): the long board you stand on to ride waves | loc: sörf tahtası
  EN TS: Nice ride on that surfboard.
  tr TS: Sörf tahtasında harika gidiyorsun.
  EN FS: Nice ride on that jet ski.
  tr FS: Jet skide harika gidiyorsun.
  EN TP: waxing a white surfboard
  tr TP: beyaz sörf tahtasını mumlamak
  EN FP: a surfboard in a shop
  tr FP: dükkânda bir sörf tahtası
757 | surprise (noun): something nice you did not expect | loc: sürpriz
  EN TS: A puppy in a box! What a surprise!
  tr TS: Kutuda bir köpek yavrusu! Ne büyük sürpriz!
  EN FS: A kitten in a box! What a surprise!
  tr FS: Kutuda bir kedi yavrusu! Ne büyük sürpriz!
  EN TP: a surprise in a box
  tr TP: kutuda bir sürpriz
  EN FP: a surprise party at home
  tr FP: evde sürpriz parti
758 | swan (noun): a large white water bird with a long neck | loc: kuğu
  EN TS: The swan is cleaning itself.
  tr TS: Kuğu kendini temizliyor.
  EN FS: The swan is eating a fish.
  tr FS: Kuğu balık yiyor.
  EN TP: a swan on a lake
  tr TP: gölde bir kuğu
  EN FP: a swan on the grass
  tr FP: çimenlerde bir kuğu
759 | sweater (noun): a warm knitted top with long sleeves | loc: kazak
  EN TS: Rain outside, sweater inside.
  tr TS: Dışarıda yağmur, içeride kazak.
  EN FS: Sun outside, sweater inside.
  tr FS: Dışarıda güneş, içeride kazak.
  EN TP: pulling on a cozy sweater
  tr TP: rahat bir kazak giymek
  EN FP: knitting a cozy sweater
  tr FP: rahat bir kazak örmek
760 | swell (verb): to grow bigger and puffy after an injury | loc: şişmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Oh no! His ankle is swelling!
  tr TS: Eyvah! Ayak bileği şişiyor!
  EN FS: Oh no! His wrist is swelling!
  tr FS: Eyvah! El bileği şişiyor!
  EN TP: an ankle swelling up
  tr TP: şişen bir ayak bileği
  EN FP: a wrist swelling up
  tr FP: şişen bir el bileği
761 | swelling (noun): a puffed-up part of the body after injury | loc: şişlik
  EN TS: Her foot has a big swelling.
  tr TS: Ayağında büyük bir şişlik var.
  EN FS: Her hand has a big swelling.
  tr FS: Elinde büyük bir şişlik var.
  EN TP: a swelling on the ankle
  tr TP: ayak bileğinde şişlik
  EN FP: a swelling on the knee
  tr FP: dizde şişlik
762 | t-shirt (noun): a simple top with short sleeves and no collar | loc: tişört
  EN TS: No, no, maybe... that T-shirt!
  tr TS: Yok, yok, belki... şu tişört!
  EN FS: No, no, maybe... that jacket!
  tr FS: Yok, yok, belki... şu ceket!
  EN TP: pulling on a teal T-shirt
  tr TP: petrol mavisi tişört giymek
  EN FP: folding a teal T-shirt
  tr FP: petrol mavisi tişört katlamak
763 | tablecloth (noun): a cloth spread over a table to cover it | loc: masa örtüsü
  EN TS: The tablecloth is flying up.
  tr TS: Masa örtüsü havaya uçuyor.
  EN FS: The curtain is flying up.
  tr FS: Perde havaya uçuyor.
  EN TP: throwing a tablecloth up
  tr TP: masa örtüsünü havaya atmak
  EN FP: a tablecloth with wine stains
  tr FP: şarap lekeli masa örtüsü
764 | tablet (noun): a flat computer with a touch screen | loc: tablet
  EN TS: He is drawing on a tablet.
  tr TS: Tablete çizim yapıyor.
  EN FS: He is drawing on a napkin.
  tr FS: Peçeteye çizim yapıyor.
  EN TP: drawing on a tablet
  tr TP: tablete çizim yapmak
  EN FP: a tablet of medicine
  tr FP: bir ilaç tableti
766 | tattoo (noun): a permanent picture inked into the skin | loc: dövme
  EN TS: This tattoo is forever!
  tr TS: Bu dövme sonsuza kadar!
  EN FS: This sticker is forever!
  tr FS: Bu çıkartma sonsuza kadar!
  EN TP: a fresh bird tattoo
  tr TP: yeni yapılmış kuş dövmesi
  EN FP: a tattoo on a leg
  tr FP: bacakta bir dövme
767 | tea (noun): a hot drink made by soaking dried leaves | loc: çay
  EN TS: The tea leaves are dancing!
  tr TS: Çay yaprakları dans ediyor!
  EN FS: The tea bags are dancing!
  tr FS: Çay poşetleri dans ediyor!
  EN TP: pouring mint tea
  tr TP: naneli çay koymak
  EN FP: tea with milk
  tr FP: sütlü çay
768 | team (noun): a group of people who work or play together | loc: takım
  EN TS: The team is rowing in unison.
  tr TS: Takım uyum içinde kürek çekiyor.
  EN FS: The team is running in unison.
  tr FS: Takım uyum içinde koşuyor.
  EN TP: a rowing team at sunrise
  tr TP: gün doğumunda kürek takımı
  EN FP: a team in an office
  tr FP: ofiste bir takım
769 | teaspoon (noun): a small spoon for stirring drinks | loc: çay kaşığı
  EN TS: The teaspoons are tiny.
  tr TS: Çay kaşıkları minicik.
  EN FS: The teaspoons are huge.
  tr FS: Çay kaşıkları kocaman.
  EN TP: stirring with a teaspoon
  tr TP: çay kaşığıyla karıştırmak
  EN FP: a teaspoon of sugar
  tr FP: bir çay kaşığı şeker
770 | tennis (noun): a game of hitting a ball over a net with rackets | loc: tenis
  EN TS: She dived for a tennis ball!
  tr TS: Tenis topu için kendini attı!
  EN FS: She dived for a golf ball!
  tr FS: Golf topu için kendini attı!
  EN TP: diving in a tennis match
  tr TP: tenis maçında atlayış
  EN FP: tennis on a grass court
  tr FP: çim kortta tenis
771 | terminal (noun): the airport building where flights start | loc: terminal
  EN TS: The terminal is huge.
  tr TS: Terminal devasa.
  EN FS: The terminal is tiny.
  tr FS: Terminal minicik.
  EN TP: a huge glass terminal
  tr TP: devasa cam terminal
  EN FP: a small bus terminal
  tr FP: küçük bir otobüs terminali
772 | therapy (noun): treatment by talking to a professional | loc: terapi
  EN TS: Therapy is helping the client.
  tr TS: Terapi danışana iyi geliyor.
  EN FS: Yoga is helping the client.
  tr FS: Yoga danışana iyi geliyor.
  EN TP: a therapy session
  tr TP: bir terapi seansı
  EN FP: a yoga session
  tr FP: bir yoga seansı
773 | thermometer (noun): an instrument that measures temperature | loc: termometre
  EN TS: His thermometer went crazy!
  tr TS: Termometresi çıldırdı!
  EN FS: His watch went crazy!
  tr FS: Saati çıldırdı!
  EN TP: a thermometer in the mouth
  tr TP: ağızda termometre
  EN FP: a thermometer on the wall
  tr FP: duvarda termometre
775 | thinking (noun): using your mind to work something out | loc: düşünme
  EN TS: So much thinking for one move!
  tr TS: Tek hamle için bu kadar düşünmek mi?!
  EN FS: So much thinking for one goal!
  tr FS: Tek gol için bu kadar düşünmek mi?!
  EN TP: deep thinking over chess
  tr TP: satranç başında derin düşünme
  EN FP: deep thinking over cards
  tr FP: kartlar başında derin düşünme
776 | thirst (noun): the strong feeling of needing to drink | loc: susuzluk | translator note: "thirst for adventure" does not travel with susuzluk
  EN TS: One drop for a big thirst.
  tr TS: Koca susuzluğa tek damla.
  EN FS: One biscuit for a big thirst.
  tr FS: Koca susuzluğa tek bisküvi.
  EN TP: a terrible thirst
  tr TP: korkunç bir susuzluk
  EN FP: a thirst for adventure
  tr FP: çölde susuzluk
777 | thirsty (adjective): needing or wanting something to drink | loc: susamış
  EN TS: He is super thirsty!
  tr TS: Fena susamış!
  EN FS: He is super hungry!
  tr FS: Fena acıkmış!
  EN TP: thirsty at the market
  tr TP: pazarda susamış
  EN FP: thirsty after a run
  tr FP: koşudan sonra susamış
778 | thread (noun): a long thin strand of cotton for sewing | loc: iplik | translator note: chat-thread pun does not travel
  EN TS: A thread that is miles long!
  tr TS: Kilometrelerce uzun bir iplik!
  EN FS: A rope that is miles long!
  tr FS: Kilometrelerce uzun bir halat!
  EN TP: a long red thread
  tr TP: uzun kırmızı bir iplik
  EN FP: a chat thread
  tr FP: bir makara mavi iplik
779 | otter (noun): a playful furry animal that lives by water | loc: su samuru
  EN TS: This otter wants a nap.
  tr TS: Bu su samuru biraz şekerleme istiyor.
  EN FS: This cat wants a nap.
  tr FS: Bu kedi biraz şekerleme istiyor.
  EN TP: a sleepy otter
  tr TP: uykulu bir su samuru
  EN FP: an otter in a river
  tr FP: nehirde bir su samuru
780 | stand (verb): to be upright on your feet | loc: ayakta durmak
  EN TS: The cats are standing like soldiers!
  tr TS: Kediler asker gibi ayakta duruyor!
  EN FS: The dogs are standing like soldiers!
  tr FS: Köpekler asker gibi ayakta duruyor!
  EN TP: cats standing on a bed
  tr TP: yatakta ayakta duran kediler
  EN FP: cats standing on a table
  tr FP: masada ayakta duran kediler
781 | thunder (noun): the loud noise after lightning in a storm | loc: gök gürültüsü
  EN TS: One, two, three... thunder!
  tr TS: Bir, iki, üç... gök gürültüsü!
  EN FS: One, two, three... rainbow!
  tr FS: Bir, iki, üç... gökkuşağı!
  EN TP: waiting for the thunder
  tr TP: gök gürültüsünü beklemek
  EN FP: thunder in a football stadium
  tr FP: futbol stadında gök gürültüsü
782 | tie (noun): a long strip of cloth worn around the collar | loc: kravat
  EN TS: Second try, perfect tie.
  tr TS: İkinci deneme, kusursuz kravat.
  EN FS: Second try, perfect cake.
  tr FS: İkinci deneme, kusursuz pasta.
  EN TP: knotting a dark red tie
  tr TP: koyu kırmızı kravat bağlamak
  EN FP: buying a dark red tie
  tr FP: koyu kırmızı kravat almak
783 | tiger (noun): a big wild cat with orange fur and black stripes | loc: kaplan
  EN TS: Wet tiger, bad mood!
  tr TS: Islak kaplan, sinirler tavan!
  EN FS: Wet lion, bad mood!
  tr FS: Islak aslan, sinirler tavan!
  EN TP: a tiger in a river
  tr TP: nehirde bir kaplan
  EN FP: a tiger in a tree
  tr FP: ağaçta bir kaplan
784 | tilt (verb): to lean something into a slanted position | loc: eğmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She's tilting the umbrella.
  tr TS: Şemsiyeyi eğiyor.
  EN FS: She's closing the umbrella.
  tr FS: Şemsiyeyi kapatıyor.
  EN TP: tilting the umbrella
  tr TP: şemsiyeyi eğmek
  EN FP: tilting her head
  tr FP: başını eğmek
785 | timetable (noun): a list of times when trains or buses leave | loc: tarife
  EN TS: He is checking the timetable.
  tr TS: Tarifeye bakıyor.
  EN FS: He is checking the newspaper.
  tr FS: Gazeteye bakıyor.
  EN TP: a big train timetable
  tr TP: büyük bir tren tarifesi
  EN FP: a school timetable
  tr FP: bir ders programı
786 | tired (adjective): needing rest or sleep | loc: yorgun
  EN TS: He is a little tired.
  tr TS: Birazcık yorgun.
  EN FS: He is not tired at all.
  tr FS: Hiç yorgun değil.
  EN TP: tired after work
  tr TP: işten sonra yorgun
  EN FP: tired of waiting
  tr FP: beklemekten yorgun
787 | to judge (verb): to form a critical opinion about someone | loc: yargılamak
  EN TS: She does not judge her friend.
  tr TS: Arkadaşını yargılamıyor.
  EN FS: She does not judge her dog.
  tr FS: Köpeğini yargılamıyor.
  EN TP: not judging a friend
  tr TP: arkadaşını yargılamamak
  EN FP: judging a cooking contest
  tr FP: yemek yarışmasını yargılamak
788 | to microwave (verb): to heat food in a microwave oven | loc: mikrodalgada ısıtmak
  EN TS: She wants the microwave next.
  tr TS: Sırada mikrodalgada ısıtmak isteyen o.
  EN FS: She wants the oven next.
  tr FS: Sırada fırında ısıtmak isteyen o.
  EN TP: microwaving a noodle bowl
  tr TP: noodle kasesini mikrodalgada ısıtmak
  EN FP: microwaving a cup of milk
  tr FP: sütü mikrodalgada ısıtmak
789 | toaster (noun): a machine that makes bread brown and crispy | loc: ekmek kızartma makinesi
  EN TS: The toaster fired the toast!
  tr TS: Ekmek kızartma makinesi tostu fırlattı!
  EN FS: The oven fired the toast!
  tr FS: Fırın tostu fırlattı!
  EN TP: a popping toaster
  tr TP: ekmek fırlatan kızartma makinesi
  EN FP: a toaster oven
  tr FP: mini bir fırın
790 | tomato (noun): a soft red fruit used in salads and sauces | loc: domates
  EN TS: Nice work with that tomato.
  tr TS: O domatesle harika iş çıkardın.
  EN FS: Nice work with that onion.
  tr FS: O soğanla harika iş çıkardın.
  EN TP: slicing a ripe tomato
  tr TP: olgun bir domatesi dilimlemek
  EN FP: planting a tomato
  tr FP: domates fidesi dikmek
791 | tool (noun): a thing you hold to help you fix or make things | loc: alet
  EN TS: He picked the wrong tool first.
  tr TS: Önce yanlış aleti seçti.
  EN FS: He picked the right tool first.
  tr FS: Önce doğru aleti seçti.
  EN TP: picking the right tool
  tr TP: doğru aleti seçmek
  EN FP: a tool for the garden
  tr FP: bahçe için bir alet
792 | toothpaste (noun): a cream you put on a brush to clean teeth | loc: diş macunu
  EN TS: Way too much toothpaste!
  tr TS: Bu ne kadar çok diş macunu!
  EN FS: Way too much shampoo!
  tr FS: Bu ne kadar çok şampuan!
  EN TP: a tower of toothpaste
  tr TP: diş macunundan bir kule
  EN FP: a tube of toothpaste
  tr FP: bir tüp diş macunu
793 | top (noun): the highest part or point of something | loc: tepe
  EN TS: She put the last stone on top.
  tr TS: Son taşı tepeye koydu.
  EN FS: She put the last shell on top.
  tr FS: Son deniz kabuğunu tepeye koydu.
  EN TP: a stone on the top
  tr TP: tepede bir taş
  EN FP: the top of a car
  tr FP: arabanın tepesi
794 | tournament (noun): a series of matches until one winner is left | loc: turnuva
  EN TS: The boy won the tournament!
  tr TS: Turnuvayı çocuk kazandı!
  EN FS: The sailor won the tournament!
  tr FS: Turnuvayı denizci kazandı!
  EN TP: an arm-wrestling tournament
  tr TP: bilek güreşi turnuvası
  EN FP: a chess tournament
  tr FP: satranç turnuvası
795 | towel (noun): a soft cloth for drying yourself | loc: havlu
  EN TS: The dog gets the towel too!
  tr TS: Havlu köpeğe de var!
  EN FS: The cat gets the towel too!
  tr FS: Havlu kediye de var!
  EN TP: drying off with a towel
  tr TP: havluyla kurulanmak
  EN FP: lying on a beach towel
  tr FP: plaj havlusunda uzanmak
797 | track (noun): an oval path for running races | loc: pist | translator note: FP train track swapped to runway (pist pun)
  EN TS: They are racing on the track!
  tr TS: Pistte yarışıyorlar!
  EN FS: They are racing in the pool!
  tr FS: Havuzda yarışıyorlar!
  EN TP: a red running track
  tr TP: kırmızı bir koşu pisti
  EN FP: a train track
  tr FP: bir uçak pisti
798 | tracksuit (noun): a matching zip jacket and loose trousers | loc: eşofman
  EN TS: Tracksuit gang in the alley!
  tr TS: Eşofman çetesi ara sokakta!
  EN FS: Tracksuit gang on the beach!
  tr FS: Eşofman çetesi plajda!
  EN TP: matching turquoise tracksuits
  tr TP: uyumlu turkuaz eşofmanlar
  EN FP: tracksuits on a running track
  tr FP: koşu pistinde eşofmanlılar
800 | training (noun): practising a sport to get better at it | loc: antrenman
  EN TS: Training done, legs gone.
  tr TS: Antrenman bitti, bacaklar gitti.
  EN FS: Match done, legs gone.
  tr FS: Maç bitti, bacaklar gitti.
  EN TP: training under floodlights
  tr TP: projektör altında antrenman
  EN FP: training a puppy
  tr FP: köpek yavrusuyla antrenman
801 | trampoline (noun): a stretchy mat on a frame you bounce on | loc: trambolin
  EN TS: She is flying on a trampoline!
  tr TS: Trambolinde uçuyor!
  EN FS: She is flying on a bed!
  tr FS: Yatakta uçuyor!
  EN TP: bouncing on a trampoline
  tr TP: trambolinde zıplamak
  EN FP: hiding under a trampoline
  tr FP: trambolinin altına saklanmak
802 | trash can (noun): a container you put rubbish in | loc: çöp kovası
  EN TS: He is playing LeBron over a trash can.
  tr TS: Çöp kovasına LeBron'luk yapıyor.
  EN FS: He is playing LeBron over a bathtub.
  tr FS: Küvete LeBron'luk yapıyor.
  EN TP: a trash can hoop
  tr TP: çöp kovasından pota
  EN FP: a trash can lid
  tr FP: çöp kovası kapağı
804 | travel (verb): to go to other places, often far away | loc: seyahat etmek
  EN TS: She totally loves to travel.
  tr TS: Seyahat etmeye bayılıyor.
  EN FS: She totally hates to travel.
  tr FS: Seyahat etmekten nefret ediyor.
  EN TP: to travel by plane
  tr TP: uçakla seyahat etmek
  EN FP: to travel by bus
  tr FP: otobüsle seyahat etmek
805 | traveling (noun): going on trips to other places | loc: seyahat
  EN TS: Traveling by train, just in time!
  tr TS: Trenle seyahat, tam zamanında!
  EN FS: Traveling by bus, just in time!
  tr FS: Otobüsle seyahat, tam zamanında!
  EN TP: traveling through the Alps
  tr TP: Alpler'de seyahat
  EN FP: traveling by ship
  tr FP: gemiyle seyahat
806 | tray (noun): a flat board for carrying food and drinks | loc: tepsi
  EN TS: She carries trays like a pro.
  tr TS: Tepsileri profesyonel gibi taşıyor.
  EN FS: She carries boxes like a pro.
  tr FS: Kutuları profesyonel gibi taşıyor.
  EN TP: a tray held high
  tr TP: havada tutulan tepsi
  EN FP: a tray on the floor
  tr FP: yerde bir tepsi
807 | treadmill (noun): a gym machine with a moving belt to run on | loc: koşu bandı
  EN TS: The treadmill almost won, bro.
  tr TS: Koşu bandı az kalsın kazanıyordu, kanka.
  EN FS: The bike almost won, bro.
  tr FS: Kondisyon bisikleti az kalsın kazanıyordu, kanka.
  EN TP: running on a treadmill
  tr TP: koşu bandında koşmak
  EN FP: walking on a treadmill
  tr FP: koşu bandında yürümek
808 | tree (noun): a tall plant with a wooden trunk and branches | loc: ağaç
  EN TS: The tree is huge!
  tr TS: Ağaç devasa!
  EN FS: The rock is huge!
  tr FS: Kaya devasa!
  EN TP: a huge old tree
  tr TP: devasa yaşlı bir ağaç
  EN FP: a tree house
  tr FP: bir ağaç ev
809 | trend (noun): a style that suddenly everyone follows | loc: trend
  EN TS: Even the corgi follows the trend!
  tr TS: Korgi bile trende uyuyor!
  EN FS: Even the cat follows the trend!
  tr FS: Kedi bile trende uyuyor!
  EN TP: following the yellow hat trend
  tr TP: sarı şapka trendine uymak
  EN FP: starting a new trend
  tr FP: yeni bir trend başlatmak
811 | trophy (noun): a cup or prize you get for winning | loc: kupa
  EN TS: Trophy up, confetti down!
  tr TS: Kupa yukarı, konfeti aşağı!
  EN FS: Medal up, confetti down!
  tr FS: Madalya yukarı, konfeti aşağı!
  EN TP: lifting a gold trophy
  tr TP: altın kupayı kaldırmak
  EN FP: cleaning a gold trophy
  tr FP: altın kupayı temizlemek
812 | trust (noun): the feeling that you can rely on someone | loc: güven
  EN TS: Total trust: she's letting go of the rock!
  tr TS: Tam güven: kayayı bırakıyor!
  EN FS: Total trust: she's letting go of the rope!
  tr FS: Tam güven: ipi bırakıyor!
  EN TP: trust in her partner
  tr TP: partnerine güven
  EN FP: trust in her luck
  tr FP: şansına güven
813 | turkey (noun): a big farm bird with a red neck and fan tail | loc: hindi
  EN TS: The turkey is posing like a star.
  tr TS: Hindi yıldız gibi poz veriyor.
  EN FS: The goose is posing like a star.
  tr FS: Kaz yıldız gibi poz veriyor.
  EN TP: a turkey on the hay
  tr TP: samanın üstünde bir hindi
  EN FP: a turkey on a plate
  tr FP: tabakta bir hindi
814 | turn off (verb): to stop a machine or light with a switch | loc: kapatmak
  EN TS: She is turning off the fan.
  tr TS: Vantilatörü kapatıyor.
  EN FS: She is turning off the TV.
  tr FS: Televizyonu kapatıyor.
  EN TP: to turn off the light
  tr TP: ışığı kapatmak
  EN FP: to turn off the road
  tr FP: yolu kapatmak
815 | turtle (noun): a sea animal with a hard shell on its back | loc: kaplumbağa
  EN TS: The turtle is in the sea now.
  tr TS: Kaplumbağa artık denizde.
  EN FS: The turtle is in a pool now.
  tr FS: Kaplumbağa artık havuzda.
  EN TP: a turtle on the beach
  tr TP: sahilde bir kaplumbağa
  EN FP: a turtle in a tank
  tr FP: akvaryumda bir kaplumbağa
816 | tuxedo (noun): a formal black suit worn with a bow tie | loc: smokin
  EN TS: He looks great in a tuxedo.
  tr TS: Smokinle harika görünüyor.
  EN FS: He looks great in a tracksuit.
  tr FS: Eşofmanla harika görünüyor.
  EN TP: putting on a tuxedo
  tr TP: smokin giymek
  EN FP: renting a tuxedo
  tr FP: smokin kiralamak
817 | side by side (phrase): next to each other, close together in a row | loc: yan yana
  EN TS: Two cats are side by side.
  tr TS: İki kedi yan yana.
  EN FS: Two dogs are side by side.
  tr FS: İki köpek yan yana.
  EN TP: two cats side by side
  tr TP: yan yana iki kedi
  EN FP: two cats face to face
  tr FP: karşı karşıya iki kedi
818 | typing (noun): pressing keys to write on a keyboard | loc: klavyede yazma
  EN TS: Her typing is super fast!
  tr TS: Klavyede yazması çok hızlı!
  EN FS: Her reading is super fast!
  tr FS: Okuması çok hızlı!
  EN TP: fast typing
  tr TP: klavyede hızlı yazma
  EN FP: typing a text message
  tr FP: telefondan mesaj yazmak
819 | umbrella (noun): a folding cover that keeps rain off you | loc: şemsiye
  EN TS: Nice umbrella. Room for me?
  tr TS: Güzel şemsiye. Bana da yer var mı?
  EN FS: Nice car. Room for me?
  tr FS: Güzel araba. Bana da yer var mı?
  EN TP: sharing an umbrella
  tr TP: şemsiyeyi paylaşmak
  EN FP: an umbrella on the beach
  tr FP: plajda bir şemsiye
821 | underwear (noun): the clothes worn next to your skin | loc: iç çamaşırı
  EN TS: Home again: underwear time!
  tr TS: Eve dönüş: iç çamaşırı saati!
  EN FS: Home again: pyjama time!
  tr FS: Eve dönüş: pijama saati!
  EN TP: stripping down to underwear
  tr TP: iç çamaşırına kadar soyunmak
  EN FP: buying new underwear
  tr FP: yeni iç çamaşırı almak
823 | screen (noun): the flat glass part of a computer, TV or phone | loc: ekran
  EN TS: The screen shows the numbers.
  tr TS: Ekran rakamları gösteriyor.
  EN FS: The screen shows the weather.
  tr FS: Ekran hava durumunu gösteriyor.
  EN TP: pointing at the screen
  tr TP: ekranı işaret etmek
  EN FP: cleaning the screen
  tr FP: ekranı silmek
825 | view (noun): the land or sea you can see from a place | loc: manzara
  EN TS: The dog loves the view too.
  tr TS: Köpek de manzaraya bayılıyor.
  EN FS: The cat loves the view too.
  tr FS: Kedi de manzaraya bayılıyor.
  EN TP: a view of rocky peaks
  tr TP: kayalık zirve manzarası
  EN FP: a view of the sea
  tr FP: deniz manzarası
826 | film (verb): to record moving pictures with a camera | loc: çekmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: They are filming in an office.
  tr TS: Ofiste film çekiyorlar.
  EN FS: They are filming in a forest.
  tr FS: Ormanda film çekiyorlar.
  EN TP: filming with a camera dolly
  tr TP: kamera dolly'siyle çekim yapmak
  EN FP: filming a wedding
  tr FP: bir düğünü çekmek
827 | animal (noun): a living thing that moves, like a dog or a bird | loc: hayvan
  EN TS: There are many animals here.
  tr TS: Burada bir sürü hayvan var.
  EN FS: There are two animals here.
  tr FS: Burada iki hayvan var.
  EN TP: animals in a storybook
  tr TP: masal kitabında hayvanlar
  EN FP: animals in a real zoo
  tr FP: gerçek bir hayvanat bahçesinde hayvanlar
828 | surprised (adjective): feeling shock at something unexpected | loc: şaşırmış
  EN TS: Hot news? She looks surprised.
  tr TS: Sıcak haber mi? Kadın şaşırmış görünüyor.
  EN FS: Hot news? He looks surprised.
  tr FS: Sıcak haber mi? Adam şaşırmış görünüyor.
  EN TP: surprised in a cafe
  tr TP: kafede şaşırmış
  EN FP: surprised at the door
  tr FP: kapıda şaşırmış
830 | explain (verb): to make something clear to someone | loc: açıklamak
  EN TS: She is explaining the changes.
  tr TS: Değişiklikleri açıklıyor.
  EN FS: She is explaining the menu.
  tr FS: Menüyü açıklıyor.
  EN TP: explaining the app design
  tr TP: uygulama tasarımını açıklamak
  EN FP: explaining a maths problem
  tr FP: bir matematik problemini açıklamak
831 | speech (noun): a formal talk given to an audience | loc: konuşma
  EN TS: She is giving a speech.
  tr TS: Bir konuşma yapıyor.
  EN FS: She is giving a concert.
  tr FS: Bir konser veriyor.
  EN TP: a speech at a podium
  tr TP: kürsüde bir konuşma
  EN FP: a speech at a wedding
  tr FP: düğünde bir konuşma
832 | unpack (verb): to take things out of a bag or case | loc: bavulu boşaltmak
  EN TS: He is unpacking the longest scarf ever.
  tr TS: Bavulu boşaltıyor: dünyanın en uzun atkısı çıkıyor.
  EN FS: He is unpacking the longest sock ever.
  tr FS: Bavulu boşaltıyor: dünyanın en uzun çorabı çıkıyor.
  EN TP: unpacking a suitcase
  tr TP: bavulu boşaltmak
  EN FP: unpacking the shopping
  tr FP: alışveriş poşetlerini boşaltmak
833 | unpacking (noun): taking things out of a bag or suitcase | loc: bavul boşaltma
  EN TS: Unpacking: the shell survived!
  tr TS: Bavul boşaltma: deniz kabuğu sağ salim!
  EN FS: Unpacking: the mug survived!
  tr FS: Bavul boşaltma: kupa sağ salim!
  EN TP: unpacking after a trip
  tr TP: yolculuktan sonra bavul boşaltma
  EN FP: unpacking a new phone
  tr FP: yeni telefonu kutusundan çıkarmak
834 | hostess (noun): a woman who invites guests and looks after them | loc: ev sahibesi
  EN TS: The hostess is done with them.
  tr TS: Ev sahibesi onlardan bıktı.
  EN FS: The waiter is done with them.
  tr FS: Garson onlardan bıktı.
  EN TP: a busy hostess serving guests
  tr TP: misafirlere servis yapan ev sahibesi
  EN FP: an air hostess
  tr FP: bir hostes
835 | plumber (noun): a worker who fixes pipes and sinks | loc: tesisatçı
  EN TS: The fake plumber got soaked!
  tr TS: Sahte tesisatçı sırılsıklam oldu!
  EN FS: The fake plumber got rich!
  tr FS: Sahte tesisatçı zengin oldu!
  EN TP: a plumber at the sink
  tr TP: lavabonun başında tesisatçı
  EN FP: a plumber on the roof
  tr FP: çatıda bir tesisatçı
836 | prepared (adjective): ready because you organized everything in advance | loc: hazırlıklı
  EN TS: He is very prepared. Too prepared.
  tr TS: Adam çok hazırlıklı. Fazla hazırlıklı.
  EN FS: She is very prepared. Too prepared.
  tr FS: Kadın çok hazırlıklı. Fazla hazırlıklı.
  EN TP: a prepared student
  tr TP: hazırlıklı bir öğrenci
  EN FP: a prepared meal
  tr FP: hazır bir yemek
837 | taxi (noun): a car you pay to drive you somewhere | loc: taksi
  EN TS: This taxi fits in any alley.
  tr TS: Bu taksi her ara sokağa sığar.
  EN FS: This bus fits in any alley.
  tr FS: Bu otobüs her ara sokağa sığar.
  EN TP: a taxi in an alley
  tr TP: ara sokakta bir taksi
  EN FP: a taxi at the airport
  tr FP: havalimanında bir taksi
838 | pilot (noun): a person who flies a plane | loc: pilot
  EN TS: The pilot thinks he is a star.
  tr TS: Pilot kendini yıldız sanıyor.
  EN FS: The chef thinks he is a star.
  tr FS: Aşçı kendini yıldız sanıyor.
  EN TP: a pilot in a jacket
  tr TP: ceketli bir pilot
  EN FP: a pilot in a plane
  tr FP: uçakta bir pilot
839 | extend (verb): to make something longer or bigger | loc: uzatmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is extending his table!
  tr TS: Masasını uzatıyor!
  EN FS: He is extending his bed!
  tr FS: Yatağını uzatıyor!
  EN TP: extending a dining table
  tr TP: yemek masasını uzatmak
  EN FP: extending a visa
  tr FP: vizeyi uzatmak
840 | hike (verb): to walk a long way in mountains or countryside | loc: doğa yürüyüşü yapmak
  EN TS: He hiked up just for a selfie.
  tr TS: Sırf bir selfie için doğa yürüyüşü yaptı.
  EN FS: He swam out just for a selfie.
  tr FS: Sırf bir selfie için açığa yüzdü.
  EN TP: hiking up to a lake
  tr TP: göle doğa yürüyüşü yapmak
  EN FP: hiking down to a beach
  tr FP: plaja inen doğa yürüyüşü
841 | melt (verb): to turn from solid to liquid when heated | loc: eritmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She melted the ice. Now what?
  tr TS: Buzu eritti. Şimdi ne olacak?
  EN FS: She froze the water. Now what?
  tr FS: Suyu dondurdu. Şimdi ne olacak?
  EN TP: to melt ice cubes
  tr TP: buz küplerini eritmek
  EN FP: to melt chocolate
  tr FP: çikolata eritmek
842 | baby (noun): a very young child who cannot walk or talk yet | loc: bebek
  EN TS: The baby wants every letter.
  tr TS: Bebek her harfi istiyor.
  EN FS: The baby wants every biscuit.
  tr FS: Bebek her bisküviyi istiyor.
  EN TP: a baby playing with letters
  tr TP: harflerle oynayan bebek
  EN FP: a baby playing with food
  tr FP: yemekle oynayan bebek
843 | up (adverb): toward a higher place | loc: yukarı
  EN TS: Higher! The basket is going up!
  tr TS: Daha yüksek! Sepet yukarı çıkıyor!
  EN FS: Higher! The bucket is going up!
  tr FS: Daha yüksek! Kova yukarı çıkıyor!
  EN TP: to pull a basket up
  tr TP: sepeti yukarı çekmek
  EN FP: to pull a boat up
  tr FP: tekneyi yukarı çekmek
844 | valley (noun): the low land between mountains | loc: vadi
  EN TS: What a huge green valley!
  tr TS: Ne kocaman yeşil bir vadi!
  EN FS: What a huge green desert!
  tr FS: Ne kocaman yeşil bir çöl!
  EN TP: a green valley below
  tr TP: aşağıda yeşil bir vadi
  EN FP: a valley under snow
  tr FP: kar altında bir vadi
845 | vanishing (noun): disappearing suddenly and completely | loc: kaybolmak
  EN TS: Another vanishing! Thanks, sea.
  tr TS: Bir kaybolma daha! Sağ ol, deniz.
  EN FS: Another vanishing! Thanks, dog.
  tr FS: Bir kaybolma daha! Sağ ol, köpek.
  EN TP: the vanishing of a drawing
  tr TP: bir çizimin kaybolması
  EN FP: the vanishing of a ship
  tr FP: bir geminin kaybolması
847 | victory (noun): winning a competition or a race | loc: zafer
  EN TS: Their victory is clear.
  tr TS: Zaferleri çok net.
  EN FS: Their defeat is clear.
  tr FS: Yenilgileri çok net.
  EN TP: a boat race victory
  tr TP: tekne yarışında zafer
  EN FP: a chess game victory
  tr FP: satranç maçında zafer
848 | vinegar (noun): a sour liquid used to flavour food | loc: sirke
  EN TS: Vinegar? Her face says no!
  tr TS: Sirke mi? Yüzü hayır diyor!
  EN FS: Honey? Her face says no!
  tr FS: Bal mı? Yüzü hayır diyor!
  EN TP: a splash of vinegar
  tr TP: bir damla sirke
  EN FP: cleaning with vinegar
  tr FP: sirkeyle temizlik yapmak
849 | visa (noun): a sticker in a passport that lets you enter | loc: vize
  EN TS: He got his visa!
  tr TS: Vizesini aldı!
  EN FS: He lost his visa!
  tr FS: Vizesini kaybetti!
  EN TP: a visa in a passport
  tr TP: pasaportta bir vize
  EN FP: a visa for a holiday
  tr FP: tatil için vize
850 | volcano (noun): a mountain that erupts fire and melted rock | loc: yanardağ
  EN TS: The volcano is smoking. Nobody panic.
  tr TS: Yanardağ tütüyor. Kimse panik yapmasın.
  EN FS: The chimney is smoking. Nobody panic.
  tr FS: Baca tütüyor. Kimse panik yapmasın.
  EN TP: a smoking volcano
  tr TP: tüten bir yanardağ
  EN FP: a volcano under the sea
  tr FP: deniz altında bir yanardağ
851 | wait (verb): to stay somewhere until something happens | loc: beklemek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is waiting. And waiting.
  tr TS: Bekliyor. Bekliyor da bekliyor.
  EN FS: She is dancing. And dancing.
  tr FS: Dans ediyor. Dans ediyor da dans ediyor.
  EN TP: to wait for the bus
  tr TP: otobüs beklemek
  EN FP: to wait for a taxi
  tr FP: taksi beklemek
852 | waiter (noun): a person who brings food in a restaurant | loc: garson
  EN TS: The waiter is very fast!
  tr TS: Garson çok hızlı!
  EN FS: The waiter is very slow!
  tr FS: Garson çok yavaş!
  EN TP: a waiter with plates
  tr TP: tabaklı bir garson
  EN FP: a waiter with a menu
  tr FP: menülü bir garson
853 | walk (verb): to go somewhere on foot, step by step | loc: yürümek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is walking in the park.
  tr TS: Parkta yürüyor.
  EN FS: She is running in the park.
  tr FS: Parkta koşuyor.
  EN TP: to walk by the lake
  tr TP: göl kenarında yürümek
  EN FP: to walk the dog
  tr FP: köpeği yürüyüşe çıkarmak
855 | walking (noun): going somewhere on foot for fun or exercise | loc: yürüyüş
  EN TS: They are walking by the sea.
  tr TS: Deniz kenarında yürüyüş yapıyorlar.
  EN FS: They are running by the sea.
  tr FS: Deniz kenarında koşu yapıyorlar.
  EN TP: walking by the sea
  tr TP: deniz kenarında yürüyüş
  EN FP: walking in the mountains
  tr FP: dağlarda yürüyüş
857 | wallet (noun): a small flat case for money and cards | loc: cüzdan
  EN TS: He found her wallet and got a flower.
  tr TS: Cüzdanını buldu, karşılığında çiçek aldı.
  EN FS: He found her wallet and got a cake.
  tr FS: Cüzdanını buldu, karşılığında pasta aldı.
  EN TP: returning a lost wallet
  tr TP: kayıp bir cüzdanı geri vermek
  EN FP: stealing a lost wallet
  tr FP: kayıp bir cüzdanı çalmak
859 | wardrobe (noun): a tall cupboard where clothes hang and are stored | loc: gardırop
  EN TS: The wardrobe attacked her!
  tr TS: Gardırop ona saldırdı!
  EN FS: The fridge attacked her!
  tr FS: Buzdolabı ona saldırdı!
  EN TP: a wardrobe full of coats
  tr TP: montlarla dolu gardırop
  EN FP: a wardrobe full of shoes
  tr FP: ayakkabıyla dolu gardırop
860 | washing (noun): cleaning something with water and soap | loc: yıkama
  EN TS: The car needed a "little" washing.
  tr TS: Arabanın "biraz" yıkamaya ihtiyacı vardı.
  EN FS: The bike needed a "little" washing.
  tr FS: Bisikletin "biraz" yıkamaya ihtiyacı vardı.
  EN TP: washing a muddy car
  tr TP: çamurlu bir arabayı yıkama
  EN FP: washing a muddy dog
  tr FP: çamurlu bir köpeği yıkama
861 | watch (noun): a small clock you wear on your wrist | loc: kol saati
  EN TS: His watch says: late!
  tr TS: Kol saati diyor ki: geç kaldın!
  EN FS: His phone says: late!
  tr FS: Telefonu diyor ki: geç kaldın!
  EN TP: checking a watch
  tr TP: kol saatine bakmak
  EN FP: buying a watch
  tr FP: kol saati almak
862 | watching (noun): looking at something for a while, like a film | loc: izleme
  EN TS: TV watching needs popcorn.
  tr TS: TV izleme keyfi patlamış mısır ister.
  EN FS: TV watching needs pizza.
  tr FS: TV izleme keyfi pizza ister.
  EN TP: a night of TV watching
  tr TP: TV izleme gecesi
  EN FP: a night of bird watching
  tr FP: kuş izleme gecesi
863 | water bottle (noun): a container you carry to drink from on the go | loc: matara
  EN TS: Her water bottle is metal.
  tr TS: Matarası metal.
  EN FS: Her water bottle is plastic.
  tr FS: Matarası plastik.
  EN TP: filling a water bottle
  tr TP: matarayı doldurmak
  EN FP: a water bottle in bed
  tr FP: yatakta bir matara
864 | water (noun): the clear liquid in rivers, rain and seas | loc: su
  EN TS: This water is crazy clear.
  tr TS: Bu su aşırı berrak.
  EN FS: This milk is crazy clear.
  tr FS: Bu süt aşırı berrak.
  EN TP: clear water in a bottle
  tr TP: şişede berrak su
  EN FP: water in a plastic cup
  tr FP: plastik bardakta su
866 | waterfall (noun): water falling straight down from a high rock | loc: şelale
  EN TS: A rainbow at the waterfall!
  tr TS: Şelalede gökkuşağı!
  EN FS: A rainbow at the lake!
  tr FS: Gölde gökkuşağı!
  EN TP: a tall waterfall in Iceland
  tr TP: İzlanda'da yüksek bir şelale
  EN FP: a waterfall in a garden
  tr FP: bahçede bir şelale
867 | watering (noun): giving plants a drink so they grow | loc: sulama
  EN TS: The basil likes the watering.
  tr TS: Fesleğen sulamadan hoşlanıyor.
  EN FS: The rose likes the watering.
  tr FS: Gül sulamadan hoşlanıyor.
  EN TP: watering the tomatoes
  tr TP: domatesleri sulamak
  EN FP: watering the lawn
  tr FP: çimleri sulamak
868 | wave (noun): a wall of water moving across the sea | loc: dalga | translator note: wave-of-the-hand pun does not travel
  EN TS: Just a small wave.
  tr TS: Minicik bir dalga sadece.
  EN FS: Just a small shark.
  tr FS: Minicik bir köpekbalığı sadece.
  EN TP: a wave crashing on swimmers
  tr TP: yüzücülere çarpan dalga
  EN FP: a wave of the hand
  tr FP: kumsalda küçük dalgalar
869 | weight (noun): a heavy object you lift to build strength | loc: ağırlık
  EN TS: She is carrying a weight.
  tr TS: Bir ağırlık taşıyor.
  EN FS: She is carrying a box.
  tr FS: Bir kutu taşıyor.
  EN TP: a heavy round weight
  tr TP: ağır, yuvarlak bir ağırlık
  EN FP: losing weight fast
  tr FP: hızla kilo vermek
870 | west (noun): the direction where the sun goes down | loc: batı
  EN TS: The sun sets in the west.
  tr TS: Güneş batıdan batar.
  EN FS: The sun sets in the east.
  tr FS: Güneş doğudan batar.
  EN TP: watching the sun go west
  tr TP: güneşin batıya inişini izlemek
  EN FP: driving west at night
  tr FP: gece batıya gitmek
871 | wheelchair (noun): a chair on wheels for someone who cannot walk | loc: tekerlekli sandalye
  EN TS: He scored from his wheelchair!
  tr TS: Tekerlekli sandalyesinden sayı attı!
  EN FS: He missed from his wheelchair!
  tr FS: Tekerlekli sandalyesinden sayıyı kaçırdı!
  EN TP: a sports wheelchair on court
  tr TP: sahada spor tekerlekli sandalyesi
  EN FP: a wheelchair in a hospital
  tr FP: hastanede bir tekerlekli sandalye
872 | whistling (noun): making a high sound by blowing through your lips | loc: ıslık çalma
  EN TS: Her whistling works at last!
  tr TS: Sonunda ıslık çalmayı başardı!
  EN FS: Her singing works at last!
  tr FS: Sonunda şarkı söylemeyi başardı!
  EN TP: whistling at a garden table
  tr TP: bahçe masasında ıslık çalma
  EN FP: whistling at a football game
  tr FP: futbol maçında ıslık çalma
873 | wife (noun): the woman someone is married to | loc: eş
  EN TS: His wife can flip pancakes!
  tr TS: Eşi krep çevirebiliyor!
  EN FS: His wife can flip burgers!
  tr FS: Eşi burger çevirebiliyor!
  EN TP: a wife flipping pancakes
  tr TP: krep çeviren bir eş
  EN FP: a wife baking a cake
  tr FP: kek pişiren bir eş
874 | wig (noun): false hair you wear on your head | loc: peruk
  EN TS: The pink wig suits her.
  tr TS: Pembe peruk ona çok yakışmış.
  EN FS: The pink hat suits her.
  tr FS: Pembe şapka ona çok yakışmış.
  EN TP: putting on a pink wig
  tr TP: pembe peruk takmak
  EN FP: brushing a pink wig
  tr FP: pembe peruğu taramak
875 | wind (noun): moving air you feel outside | loc: rüzgâr
  EN TS: The wind stole her scarf!
  tr TS: Rüzgâr atkısını çaldı!
  EN FS: The wind stole her hat!
  tr FS: Rüzgâr şapkasını çaldı!
  EN TP: a scarf in the wind
  tr TP: rüzgârda bir atkı
  EN FP: wind blowing snow
  tr FP: karı savuran rüzgâr
876 | wine (noun): an alcoholic drink made from grapes | loc: şarap
  EN TS: Red wine at sunset? Classy move.
  tr TS: Gün batımında kırmızı şarap? Klas hareket.
  EN FS: Cold beer at sunset? Classy move.
  tr FS: Gün batımında soğuk bira? Klas hareket.
  EN TP: a glass of red wine
  tr TP: bir kadeh kırmızı şarap
  EN FP: a bottle of white wine
  tr FP: bir şişe beyaz şarap
877 | winner (noun): the person who comes first in a race or game | loc: kazanan
  EN TS: Muddy winner? Legend!
  tr TS: Çamurlu kazanan? Efsane!
  EN FS: Clean winner? Legend!
  tr FS: Tertemiz kazanan? Efsane!
  EN TP: winner of a mud race
  tr TP: çamur koşusunun kazananı
  EN FP: winner of a swim race
  tr FP: yüzme yarışının kazananı
878 | winter (noun): the coldest season of the year | loc: kış
  EN TS: Winter fun on sleds!
  tr TS: Kızaklarla kış eğlencesi!
  EN FS: Winter fun on skis!
  tr FS: Kayaklarla kış eğlencesi!
  EN TP: a winter day on sleds
  tr TP: kızaklarla bir kış günü
  EN FP: a winter day indoors
  tr FP: evde bir kış günü
879 | wolf (noun): a wild animal like a big dog that hunts in packs | loc: kurt
  EN TS: The wolf is howling!
  tr TS: Kurt uluyor!
  EN FS: The wolf is sleeping!
  tr FS: Kurt uyuyor!
  EN TP: a wolf in the snow
  tr TP: karda bir kurt
  EN FP: a wolf on a beach
  tr FP: kumsalda bir kurt
880 | wool (noun): the soft hair of sheep used to make clothes | loc: yün
  EN TS: The lamb is wearing its own wool!
  tr TS: Kuzu kendi yününü giyiyor!
  EN FS: The lamb is wearing a wool hat!
  tr FS: Kuzu yün bere takıyor!
  EN TP: a ball of wool
  tr TP: bir yumak yün
  EN FP: a wool blanket
  tr FP: yün bir battaniye
882 | workout (noun): a session of hard exercise to get fit | loc: antrenman
  EN TS: The dog is her workout coach.
  tr TS: Köpek onun antrenman koçu.
  EN FS: The cat is her workout coach.
  tr FS: Kedi onun antrenman koçu.
  EN TP: a full workout
  tr TP: tam bir antrenman
  EN FP: a workout on the beach
  tr FP: kumsalda antrenman
884 | world (noun): everything on Earth, all people and places | loc: dünya
  EN TS: She is showing him the world.
  tr TS: Ona dünyayı gösteriyor.
  EN FS: She is showing him the map.
  tr FS: Ona haritayı gösteriyor.
  EN TP: a world of city lights
  tr TP: şehir ışıklarından bir dünya
  EN FP: a map of the world
  tr FP: bir dünya haritası
885 | worm (noun): a long thin soft animal that lives in soil | loc: solucan
  EN TS: The worm is going underground.
  tr TS: Solucan toprağın altına iniyor.
  EN FS: The worm is going up a tree.
  tr FS: Solucan ağaca çıkıyor.
  EN TP: a worm in the soil
  tr TP: toprakta bir solucan
  EN FP: a worm on a hook
  tr FP: oltada bir solucan
886 | wrinkle (noun): a small line or fold in the skin | loc: kırışıklık
  EN TS: Grandma earned her wrinkles.
  tr TS: Büyükanne kırışıklıklarını hak etti.
  EN FS: The girl earned her wrinkles.
  tr FS: Kız kırışıklıklarını hak etti.
  EN TP: deep wrinkles on her face
  tr TP: yüzünde derin kırışıklıklar
  EN FP: wrinkles in a shirt
  tr FP: gömlekte kırışıklıklar
887 | write (verb): to put words on paper with a pen | loc: yazmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is writing in her journal.
  tr TS: Günlüğüne yazıyor.
  EN FS: She is writing on her laptop.
  tr FS: Laptopuna yazıyor.
  EN TP: to write in a journal
  tr TP: günlüğe yazmak
  EN FP: to write on a wall
  tr FP: duvara yazmak
888 | yawning (noun): opening the mouth wide and breathing in when tired | loc: esnemek
  EN TS: Yawning is contagious, even for dogs.
  tr TS: Esnemek bulaşıcıdır, köpekler için bile.
  EN FS: Laughing is contagious, even for dogs.
  tr FS: Gülmek bulaşıcıdır, köpekler için bile.
  EN TP: yawning in the kitchen
  tr TP: mutfakta esnemek
  EN FP: yawning in the car
  tr FP: arabada esnemek
889 | yogurt (noun): a thick creamy food made from milk | loc: yoğurt
  EN TS: Her yogurt does not pour!
  tr TS: Yoğurdu akmıyor!
  EN FS: Her honey does not pour!
  tr FS: Balı akmıyor!
  EN TP: a jar of thick yogurt
  tr TP: bir kavanoz koyu yoğurt
  EN FP: drinking yogurt from a jar
  tr FP: kavanozdan yoğurt içmek
891 | expensive (adjective): costing a lot of money | loc: pahalı
  EN TS: Oops, that car is expensive!
  tr TS: Eyvah, o araba pahalı!
  EN FS: Oops, that bike is expensive!
  tr FS: Eyvah, o bisiklet pahalı!
  EN TP: an expensive car ornament
  tr TP: pahalı bir araba süsü
  EN FP: an expensive car wash
  tr FP: pahalı bir araba yıkama
892 | rinse (verb): to wash something quickly with clean water | loc: durulamak
  EN TS: She's rinsing off seawater.
  tr TS: Üstündeki deniz suyunu duruluyor.
  EN FS: She's rinsing off the paint.
  tr FS: Üstündeki boyayı duruluyor.
  EN TP: rinsing off the seawater
  tr TP: deniz suyunu durulamak
  EN FP: rinsing off the dishes
  tr FP: bulaşıkları durulamak
893 | zip (verb): to close a jacket or bag by sliding its fastener | loc: fermuarı çekmek
  EN TS: Zipped up and ready for snow.
  tr TS: Fermuar çekildi, kar için hazır.
  EN FS: Zipped up and ready for sun.
  tr FS: Fermuar çekildi, güneş için hazır.
  EN TP: to zip up a jacket
  tr TP: ceketin fermuarını çekmek
  EN FP: to zip up a suitcase
  tr FP: bavulun fermuarını çekmek
894 | zipper (noun): a sliding fastener that closes clothes or bags | loc: fermuar
  EN TS: The zipper is stuck!
  tr TS: Fermuar sıkıştı!
  EN FS: The ski is stuck!
  tr FS: Kayak sıkıştı!
  EN TP: a stuck jacket zipper
  tr TP: sıkışmış ceket fermuarı
  EN FP: a zipper on a tent
  tr FP: çadırdaki fermuar
895 | accident (noun): an unfortunate mishap causing damage or injury | loc: kaza
  EN TS: Big jam. Maybe an accident?
  tr TS: Büyük sıkışıklık. Kaza mı var acaba?
  EN FS: Big party. Maybe an accident?
  tr FS: Büyük parti. Kaza mı var acaba?
  EN TP: an accident on the highway
  tr TP: otoyolda kaza
  EN FP: an accident in the kitchen
  tr FP: mutfakta kaza
898 | actress (noun): a woman who plays roles in films or plays | loc: oyuncu
  EN TS: The actress is spinning.
  tr TS: Kadın oyuncu fırıl fırıl dönüyor.
  EN FS: The actress is sleeping.
  tr FS: Kadın oyuncu mışıl mışıl uyuyor.
  EN TP: an actress on set
  tr TP: sette bir kadın oyuncu
  EN FP: an actress on a poster
  tr FP: afişte bir kadın oyuncu
899 | afternoon (noun): the part of the day between noon and evening | loc: öğleden sonra
  EN TS: It is a sunny afternoon.
  tr TS: Güneşli bir öğleden sonra.
  EN FS: It is a snowy afternoon.
  tr FS: Karlı bir öğleden sonra.
  EN TP: an afternoon in the park
  tr TP: parkta bir öğleden sonra
  EN FP: an afternoon at the beach
  tr FP: plajda bir öğleden sonra
900 | agent (noun): someone who handles business for others | loc: ajan | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc ajan = spy in Turkish; used temsilci
  EN TS: The agent is on the phone.
  tr TS: Temsilci telefonda.
  EN FS: The agent is on the bus.
  tr FS: Temsilci otobüste.
  EN TP: an agent on the phone
  tr TP: telefonda bir temsilci
  EN FP: a travel agent's office
  tr FP: bir seyahat acentesi ofisi
901 | air (noun): the gas around us that we breathe | loc: hava
  EN TS: He is breathing the fresh air, arms wide open.
  tr TS: Kollarını açmış, temiz havayı içine çekiyor.
  EN FS: He is breathing the city air, arms wide open.
  tr FS: Kollarını açmış, şehir havasını içine çekiyor.
  EN TP: fresh mountain air
  tr TP: temiz dağ havası
  EN FP: fresh air in the city
  tr FP: şehirde temiz hava
902 | airplane (noun): an aircraft with fixed wings, powered by jets | loc: uçak
  EN TS: She is waving at the airplane!
  tr TS: Uçağa el sallıyor!
  EN FS: She is waving at the train!
  tr FS: Trene el sallıyor!
  EN TP: a low airplane overhead
  tr TP: alçaktan geçen bir uçak
  EN FP: a paper airplane
  tr FP: kâğıttan bir uçak
904 | allergy (noun): a bad body reaction to pollen or dust | loc: alerji
  EN TS: She has a pollen allergy.
  tr TS: Polen alerjisi var.
  EN FS: She has a dust allergy.
  tr FS: Toz alerjisi var.
  EN TP: an allergy to pollen
  tr TP: polene alerji
  EN FP: an allergy to cats
  tr FP: kedilere alerji
905 | alley (noun): a very narrow street between buildings | loc: ara sokak
  EN TS: A cat is crossing the alley.
  tr TS: Bir kedi ara sokaktan geçiyor.
  EN FS: A dog is crossing the alley.
  tr FS: Bir köpek ara sokaktan geçiyor.
  EN TP: a narrow cobbled alley
  tr TP: dar, parke taşlı ara sokak
  EN FP: an alley full of shops
  tr FP: dükkânlarla dolu ara sokak
907 | anybody (noun): any person at all, it does not matter who | loc: kimse
  EN TS: Is anybody here? Only pigeons.
  tr TS: Kimse var mı? Sadece güvercinler.
  EN FS: Is anybody here? Only cats.
  tr FS: Kimse var mı? Sadece kediler.
  EN TP: anybody in the station
  tr TP: istasyonda hiç kimse
  EN FP: anybody at the party
  tr FP: partide hiç kimse
909 | anyone (noun): a person, no matter which one | loc: herhangi biri
  EN TS: He is asking if anyone is home.
  tr TS: Adam, evde herhangi biri var mı diye soruyor.
  EN FS: She is asking if anyone is home.
  tr FS: Kadın, evde herhangi biri var mı diye soruyor.
  EN TP: asking if anyone is home
  tr TP: evde herhangi biri var mı
  EN FP: asking if anyone is hungry
  tr FP: herhangi biri aç mı
911 | apartment (noun): a set of rooms to live in inside a building | loc: daire
  EN TS: A bright, sunny apartment.
  tr TS: Aydınlık, güneşli bir daire.
  EN FS: A dark, gloomy apartment.
  tr FS: Karanlık, kasvetli bir daire.
  EN TP: a bright modern apartment
  tr TP: aydınlık modern bir daire
  EN FP: a bright modern office
  tr FP: aydınlık modern bir ofis
912 | architect (noun): someone whose job is designing buildings | loc: mimar
  EN TS: The architect has a blueprint.
  tr TS: Mimarın elinde bir plan var.
  EN FS: The architect has a hammer.
  tr FS: Mimarın elinde bir çekiç var.
  EN TP: an architect with plans
  tr TP: planlarıyla bir mimar
  EN FP: an architect at the beach
  tr FP: plajda bir mimar
913 | arm (noun): the human limb between the shoulder and the hand | loc: kol
  EN TS: Her arm is up high.
  tr TS: Kolu havada.
  EN FS: Her arm is down low.
  tr FS: Kolu aşağıda.
  EN TP: an arm stretched up
  tr TP: yukarı uzanmış bir kol
  EN FP: an arm in a sling
  tr FP: askıda bir kol
914 | armchair (noun): a big soft chair with supports for your arms | loc: koltuk
  EN TS: He loves this armchair!
  tr TS: Bu koltuğa bayılıyor!
  EN FS: He loves this sofa!
  tr FS: Bu kanepeye bayılıyor!
  EN TP: flopping into an armchair
  tr TP: koltuğa kendini bırakmak
  EN FP: flopping into a pool
  tr FP: havuza kendini bırakmak
916 | atm (noun): the machine in the street that gives you cash | loc: bankamatik
  EN TS: She is using an ATM.
  tr TS: Bankamatik kullanıyor.
  EN FS: She is using a phone.
  tr FS: Telefon kullanıyor.
  EN TP: an ATM in the rain
  tr TP: yağmurda bir bankamatik
  EN FP: an ATM in a shop
  tr FP: dükkânda bir bankamatik
917 | attic (noun): the room under the roof, used for storing things | loc: tavan arası
  EN TS: The attic is full of junk.
  tr TS: Tavan arası ıvır zıvır dolu.
  EN FS: The attic is full of water.
  tr FS: Tavan arası su dolu.
  EN TP: a dusty old attic
  tr TP: tozlu eski bir tavan arası
  EN FP: a bright new attic
  tr FP: aydınlık yeni bir tavan arası
918 | audience (noun): the people watching a show or a talk | loc: seyirci
  EN TS: The audience is applauding.
  tr TS: Seyirciler alkışlıyor.
  EN FS: The audience is leaving.
  tr FS: Seyirciler gidiyor.
  EN TP: a clapping audience
  tr TP: alkışlayan seyirciler
  EN FP: a TV audience
  tr FP: televizyon seyircisi
919 | aunt (noun): the sister of your mother or father | loc: teyze
  EN TS: Her aunt is a fun one.
  tr TS: Teyzesi tam bir eğlence.
  EN FS: Her uncle is a fun one.
  tr FS: Dayısı tam bir eğlence.
  EN TP: dancing with her aunt
  tr TP: teyzesiyle dans etmek
  EN FP: shopping with her aunt
  tr FP: teyzesiyle alışveriş yapmak
920 | austria (noun): a small country in central Europe with the Alps | loc: Avusturya
  EN TS: Swinging in Austria? Goals.
  tr TS: Avusturya'da salıncakta sallanmak? Hayalim!
  EN FS: Skiing in Austria? Goals.
  tr FS: Avusturya'da kayak yapmak? Hayalim!
  EN TP: swinging in Austria
  tr TP: Avusturya'da salıncakta sallanmak
  EN FP: skiing in Austria
  tr FP: Avusturya'da kayak yapmak
921 | austrian (adjective): from the country with Vienna as its capital | loc: Avusturyalı | translator note: Avusturyalı is for people; food/places use Avusturya
  EN TS: He is serving Austrian cake.
  tr TS: Avusturya usulü pasta servis ediyor.
  EN FS: He is serving Austrian beer.
  tr FS: Avusturya usulü bira servis ediyor.
  EN TP: an Austrian coffee house
  tr TP: bir Avusturya kahvehanesi
  EN FP: an Austrian beer hall
  tr FP: bir Avusturya birahanesi
925 | baggage claim (noun): the airport area where you collect suitcases | loc: bagaj alım bandı
  EN TS: Her bag is at baggage claim.
  tr TS: Çantası bagaj alım bandında.
  EN FS: Her bag is at the check-in.
  tr FS: Çantası check-in'de.
  EN TP: a bag at baggage claim
  tr TP: bagaj alım bandında bir çanta
  EN FP: a bag at security
  tr FP: güvenlikte bir çanta
926 | baker (noun): someone who bakes bread and cakes as a job | loc: fırıncı
  EN TS: The baker's bread is ready!
  tr TS: Fırıncının ekmeği hazır!
  EN FS: The baker's pizza is ready!
  tr FS: Fırıncının pizzası hazır!
  EN TP: a baker at the oven
  tr TP: fırının başında bir fırıncı
  EN FP: a baker at the till
  tr FP: kasada bir fırıncı
927 | balcony (noun): an open platform with a railing on a building | loc: balkon
  EN TS: She is shaking a rug on the balcony.
  tr TS: Balkonda halı silkeliyor.
  EN FS: She is shaking a towel on the balcony.
  tr FS: Balkonda havlu silkeliyor.
  EN TP: a rug over the balcony
  tr TP: balkondan sarkan halı
  EN FP: a plant on the balcony
  tr FP: balkonda bir bitki
929 | bandage (noun): a strip of soft cloth wrapped around a wound | loc: bandaj
  EN TS: He is wrapping a bandage.
  tr TS: Bandaj sarıyor.
  EN FS: He is wrapping a present.
  tr FS: Hediye paketliyor.
  EN TP: wrapping a white bandage
  tr TP: beyaz bandaj sarmak
  EN FP: wrapping a white scarf
  tr FP: beyaz atkı dolamak
933 | bathroom (noun): a room with a bath or shower and a washbasin | loc: banyo
  EN TS: She is in the bathroom.
  tr TS: O banyoda.
  EN FS: She is in the kitchen.
  tr FS: O mutfakta.
  EN TP: washing in the bathroom
  tr TP: banyoda yıkanmak
  EN FP: cleaning the bathroom
  tr FP: banyoyu temizlemek
934 | bathtub (noun): a large container you fill with water to wash in | loc: küvet
  EN TS: Splash! She is in the bathtub.
  tr TS: Şlap! Küvette keyif yapıyor.
  EN FS: Splash! She is in the pool.
  tr FS: Şlap! Havuzda keyif yapıyor.
  EN TP: splashing in a bathtub
  tr TP: küvette su sıçratmak
  EN FP: splashing in a puddle
  tr FP: su birikintisinde şapırdamak
938 | bed (noun): the piece of furniture you sleep on | loc: yatak
  EN TS: She is making the bed.
  tr TS: Yatağı topluyor.
  EN FS: She is making a cake.
  tr FS: Pasta yapıyor.
  EN TP: to make the bed
  tr TP: yatağı toplamak
  EN FP: to go to bed
  tr FP: yatağa girmek
939 | bedroom (noun): the room you sleep in | loc: yatak odası
  EN TS: Pillow up! Bedroom party!
  tr TS: Yastıklar havada! Yatak odası partisi!
  EN FS: Pillow up! Kitchen party!
  tr FS: Yastıklar havada! Mutfak partisi!
  EN TP: a bright messy bedroom
  tr TP: aydınlık, dağınık bir yatak odası
  EN FP: a bright messy kitchen
  tr FP: aydınlık, dağınık bir mutfak
941 | bench (noun): a long seat for more than one person | loc: bank
  EN TS: Pigeons attacked her bench!
  tr TS: Güvercinler bankına saldırdı!
  EN FS: Ducks attacked her bench!
  tr FS: Ördekler bankına saldırdı!
  EN TP: a woman on a bench
  tr TP: bankta oturan bir kadın
  EN FP: a bench at the station
  tr FP: istasyonda bir bank
942 | bicycle (noun): a vehicle with two wheels moved by pedals | loc: bisiklet
  EN TS: He is riding a bicycle.
  tr TS: Bisiklete biniyor.
  EN FS: He is riding a scooter.
  tr FS: Scooter'a biniyor.
  EN TP: a bicycle in autumn
  tr TP: sonbaharda bir bisiklet
  EN FP: a bicycle in the snow
  tr FP: karda bir bisiklet
943 | billboard (noun): a huge board above a street where ads are posted | loc: reklam panosu
  EN TS: He is papering a billboard.
  tr TS: Reklam panosuna afiş yapıştırıyor.
  EN FS: He is painting a billboard.
  tr FS: Reklam panosunu boyuyor.
  EN TP: a blank giant billboard
  tr TP: boş, dev bir reklam panosu
  EN FP: a billboard on a bus
  tr FP: otobüs üstünde reklam panosu
944 | binoculars (noun): double lenses for seeing far-away things | loc: dürbün
  EN TS: He forgot to use his binoculars.
  tr TS: Dürbününü kullanmayı unuttu.
  EN FS: He forgot to use his telescope.
  tr FS: Teleskobunu kullanmayı unuttu.
  EN TP: black binoculars at the chest
  tr TP: göğsünde siyah dürbün
  EN FP: black binoculars on a table
  tr FP: masada siyah dürbün
947 | bleeding (noun): losing blood from a cut or wound | loc: kanayan | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: His nose is bleeding.
  tr TS: Burnu kanıyor.
  EN FS: His knee is bleeding.
  tr FS: Dizi kanıyor.
  EN TP: a bleeding nose
  tr TP: kanayan bir burun
  EN FP: a bleeding knee
  tr FP: kanayan bir diz
948 | blender (noun): the machine whose blades mix food into a drink | loc: karıştırıcı
  EN TS: Berries in the blender? Yum!
  tr TS: Karıştırıcıya orman meyvesi? Nefis!
  EN FS: Cherries in the blender? Yum!
  tr FS: Karıştırıcıya kiraz? Nefis!
  EN TP: filling a blender
  tr TP: karıştırıcıyı doldurmak
  EN FP: cleaning a blender
  tr FP: karıştırıcıyı temizlemek
949 | blister (noun): a small bubble of skin filled with liquid | loc: su toplaması
  EN TS: Ouch, a blister on the heel!
  tr TS: Ay, topukta su toplaması!
  EN FS: Ouch, a blister on the toe!
  tr FS: Ay, ayak parmağında su toplaması!
  EN TP: a blister on the heel
  tr TP: topukta su toplaması
  EN FP: a blister on the hand
  tr FP: elde su toplaması
950 | blood (noun): the red liquid that flows through your body | loc: kan
  EN TS: He is giving blood.
  tr TS: Kan veriyor.
  EN FS: He is giving a speech.
  tr FS: Konuşma yapıyor.
  EN TP: a bag of donated blood
  tr TP: bir torba bağışlanmış kan
  EN FP: blood on a white shirt
  tr FP: beyaz gömlekte kan
952 | boat (noun): a small vessel for travel on water | loc: kayık
  EN TS: He is rowing a wooden boat.
  tr TS: Ahşap bir kayıkta kürek çekiyor.
  EN FS: He is rowing a rubber boat.
  tr FS: Şişme bir kayıkta kürek çekiyor.
  EN TP: rowing a wooden boat
  tr TP: ahşap kayıkla kürek çekmek
  EN FP: a boat in a harbour
  tr FP: limanda bir kayık
953 | border (noun): the line where one country meets another | loc: sınır
  EN TS: The border is open for the car.
  tr TS: Sınır araba için açık.
  EN FS: The border is open for the bus.
  tr FS: Sınır otobüs için açık.
  EN TP: a border checkpoint
  tr TP: sınır kontrol noktası
  EN FP: a border of flowers
  tr FP: çiçekli bir bahçe sınırı
954 | boss (noun): a person who is in control of workers | loc: patron
  EN TS: The boss is giving a talk.
  tr TS: Patron konuşma yapıyor.
  EN FS: The boss is giving a gift.
  tr FS: Patron hediye veriyor.
  EN TP: a boss at a meeting
  tr TP: toplantıda bir patron
  EN FP: a boss at a party
  tr FP: partide bir patron
956 | brain (noun): the organ in the head we think with | loc: beyin
  EN TS: She is studying a brain model.
  tr TS: Bir beyin modelini inceliyor.
  EN FS: She is studying a heart model.
  tr FS: Bir kalp modelini inceliyor.
  EN TP: a model of a brain
  tr TP: bir beyin maketi
  EN FP: a picture of a brain
  tr FP: bir beyin resmi
957 | branch (noun): a stem growing out from a plant's main stem | loc: dal
  EN TS: A robin sits on the branch.
  tr TS: Dalda bir kızılgerdan oturuyor.
  EN FS: An owl sits on the branch.
  tr FS: Dalda bir baykuş oturuyor.
  EN TP: a swing on a branch
  tr TP: dalda bir salıncak
  EN FP: a swing in the park
  tr FP: parkta bir salıncak
958 | bride (noun): the woman getting married that day | loc: gelin
  EN TS: The bride is ready!
  tr TS: Gelin hazır!
  EN FS: The groom is ready!
  tr FS: Damat hazır!
  EN TP: a bride with white roses
  tr TP: beyaz güllü bir gelin
  EN FP: a bride with red roses
  tr FP: kırmızı güllü bir gelin
959 | bridge (noun): a structure that lets people cross a river or road | loc: köprü
  EN TS: She is walking under a bridge.
  tr TS: Köprünün altından yürüyor.
  EN FS: She is walking over a bridge.
  tr FS: Köprünün üstünden yürüyor.
  EN TP: a huge suspension bridge
  tr TP: devasa bir asma köprü
  EN FP: a small wooden bridge
  tr FP: küçük ahşap bir köprü
960 | broom (noun): a brush with a long handle for sweeping floors | loc: süpürge
  EN TS: She is sweeping with a broom.
  tr TS: Süpürgeyle süpürüyor.
  EN FS: She is sweeping with a rake.
  tr FS: Tırmıkla süpürüyor.
  EN TP: a straw broom
  tr TP: saman bir süpürge
  EN FP: a witch's broom
  tr FP: cadı süpürgesi
961 | brother (noun): a boy or man with the same parents as you | loc: erkek kardeş
  EN TS: Big brother wins again.
  tr TS: Büyük erkek kardeş yine kazanıyor.
  EN FS: Big sister wins again.
  tr FS: Büyük kız kardeş yine kazanıyor.
  EN TP: a brother in a headlock
  tr TP: kafa kilidinde bir erkek kardeş
  EN FP: boxing with a brother
  tr FP: erkek kardeşle boks yapmak
962 | bruise (noun): a dark purple mark left after a hit | loc: çürük
  EN TS: Her knee has a big bruise.
  tr TS: Dizinde kocaman bir çürük var.
  EN FS: Her arm has a big bruise.
  tr FS: Kolunda kocaman bir çürük var.
  EN TP: a bruise on a knee
  tr TP: dizde bir çürük
  EN FP: a bruise on an eye
  tr FP: gözde bir çürük
963 | builder (noun): a person whose job is making houses and walls | loc: inşaatçı | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The builder is making a wall.
  tr TS: İnşaatçı duvar örüyor.
  EN FS: The builder is making a roof.
  tr FS: İnşaatçı çatı yapıyor.
  EN TP: a builder with a trowel
  tr TP: malalı bir inşaatçı
  EN FP: a builder with a hammer
  tr FP: çekiçli bir inşaatçı
965 | trowel (noun): a flat hand tool for spreading cement or mortar | loc: mala
  EN TS: The builder's trowel is full.
  tr TS: İnşaatçının malası dolu.
  EN FS: The builder's bucket is full.
  tr FS: İnşaatçının kovası dolu.
  EN TP: a trowel full of mortar
  tr TP: harç dolu bir mala
  EN FP: a trowel full of soil
  tr FP: toprak dolu bir mala
967 | bus driver (noun): a person who takes passengers around a city route | loc: otobüs şoförü
  EN TS: This bus driver is too happy.
  tr TS: Bu otobüs şoförü fazla mutlu.
  EN FS: This taxi driver is too happy.
  tr FS: Bu taksi şoförü fazla mutlu.
  EN TP: a smiling bus driver
  tr TP: gülümseyen bir otobüs şoförü
  EN FP: a bus driver on strike
  tr FP: grevdeki bir otobüs şoförü
970 | butcher (noun): a person who cuts and sells meat | loc: kasap
  EN TS: The butcher is cutting beef.
  tr TS: Kasap dana eti kesiyor.
  EN FS: The butcher is cutting bread.
  tr FS: Kasap ekmek kesiyor.
  EN TP: a butcher slicing beef
  tr TP: dana eti dilimleyen kasap
  EN FP: a butcher selling fish
  tr FP: balık satan bir kasap
973 | cactus (noun): a desert plant covered in sharp spines | loc: kaktüs
  EN TS: A bird landed on the cactus.
  tr TS: Kaktüse bir kuş kondu.
  EN FS: A bee landed on the cactus.
  tr FS: Kaktüse bir arı kondu.
  EN TP: a bird on a cactus
  tr TP: kaktüsün üstünde bir kuş
  EN FP: a cactus in a pot
  tr FP: saksıda bir kaktüs
974 | cafe (noun): a small restaurant selling drinks and snacks | loc: kafe
  EN TS: It is a busy little cafe.
  tr TS: Kalabalık, küçük bir kafe.
  EN FS: It is an empty little cafe.
  tr FS: Boş, küçük bir kafe.
  EN TP: a cozy sunlit cafe
  tr TP: güneşli, şirin bir kafe
  EN FP: a closed cafe
  tr FP: kapalı bir kafe
977 | camera (noun): the equipment you use for taking photographs | loc: fotoğraf makinesi
  EN TS: She is aiming her camera.
  tr TS: Fotoğraf makinesini doğrultuyor.
  EN FS: She is aiming her phone.
  tr FS: Telefonunu doğrultuyor.
  EN TP: a vintage camera
  tr TP: eski model bir fotoğraf makinesi
  EN FP: a security camera
  tr FP: bir güvenlik kamerası
980 | captain (noun): the person in command of a ship | loc: kaptan
  EN TS: The captain is at the wheel.
  tr TS: Kaptan dümende.
  EN FS: The captain is at the bar.
  tr FS: Kaptan barda.
  EN TP: a captain at the wheel
  tr TP: dümende bir kaptan
  EN FP: a football team captain
  tr FP: futbol takımı kaptanı
981 | car (noun): a motor vehicle with four wheels | loc: araba
  EN TS: Green car, sea view, pure style.
  tr TS: Yeşil araba, deniz manzarası, saf stil.
  EN FS: Green car, city view, pure style.
  tr FS: Yeşil araba, şehir manzarası, saf stil.
  EN TP: a green classic car
  tr TP: yeşil klasik bir araba
  EN FP: a green family car
  tr FP: yeşil bir aile arabası
983 | cashier (noun): the person who takes payments at a shop | loc: kasiyer
  EN TS: The cashier is scanning a jar.
  tr TS: Kasiyer bir kavanozu okutuyor.
  EN FS: The cashier is scanning a can.
  tr FS: Kasiyer bir konserveyi okutuyor.
  EN TP: a cashier at the checkout
  tr TP: kasada bir kasiyer
  EN FP: a cashier in a bank
  tr FP: bankada bir kasiyer
984 | cast (noun): a hard cover that holds a broken bone still | loc: alçı
  EN TS: The plaster cast is still wet.
  tr TS: Alçı hâlâ ıslak.
  EN FS: The plaster cast is dry.
  tr FS: Alçı kupkuru.
  EN TP: a fresh arm cast
  tr TP: yeni takılmış kol alçısı
  EN FP: a fresh leg cast
  tr FP: yeni takılmış bacak alçısı
986 | caterpillar (noun): the young worm-like form of a butterfly | loc: tırtıl
  EN TS: A caterpillar is eating lunch.
  tr TS: Bir tırtıl öğle yemeği yiyor.
  EN FS: A snail is eating lunch.
  tr FS: Bir salyangoz öğle yemeği yiyor.
  EN TP: a caterpillar eating a leaf
  tr TP: yaprak yiyen bir tırtıl
  EN FP: a caterpillar on a flower
  tr FP: çiçekte bir tırtıl
989 | check in (phrase): to register at a desk before a flight or stay | loc: check-in yapmak
  EN TS: She is checking in her bag.
  tr TS: Bavulunun check-in'ini yapıyor.
  EN FS: She is checking in her dog.
  tr FS: Köpeğinin check-in'ini yapıyor.
  EN TP: checking in at the airport
  tr TP: havalimanında check-in yapmak
  EN FP: checking in at a hotel
  tr FP: otelde check-in yapmak
990 | chef (noun): a professional cook | loc: şef
  EN TS: The chef is using tweezers.
  tr TS: Şef cımbız kullanıyor.
  EN FS: The chef is using a spoon.
  tr FS: Şef kaşık kullanıyor.
  EN TP: a chef plating food
  tr TP: tabak süsleyen bir şef
  EN FP: a chef tasting soup
  tr FP: çorba tadan bir şef
991 | chest (noun): the front upper part of the body | loc: göğüs
  EN TS: His chest is bare.
  tr TS: Göğsü çıplak.
  EN FS: His chest is covered.
  tr FS: Göğsü örtülü.
  EN TP: a bare chest
  tr TP: çıplak bir göğüs
  EN FP: a treasure chest
  tr FP: bir hazine sandığı
995 | classmate (noun): a student in the same class at school as you | loc: sınıf arkadaşı
  EN TS: Her classmate knows a secret.
  tr TS: Sınıf arkadaşı bir sır biliyor.
  EN FS: Her teacher knows a secret.
  tr FS: Öğretmeni bir sır biliyor.
  EN TP: whispering to a classmate
  tr TP: sınıf arkadaşına fısıldamak
  EN FP: a classmate at the board
  tr FP: tahtada bir sınıf arkadaşı
996 | clay (noun): soft wet earth shaped and baked into pots | loc: kil
  EN TS: Hands are shaping wet clay.
  tr TS: Eller ıslak kile şekil veriyor.
  EN FS: Hands are shaping wet sand.
  tr FS: Eller ıslak kuma şekil veriyor.
  EN TP: shaping a clay pot
  tr TP: kilden çömlek şekillendirmek
  EN FP: painting a clay pot
  tr FP: kil çömlek boyamak
998 | clerk (noun): an office worker who handles papers and records | loc: memur
  EN TS: Papers flying, clerk still stamping.
  tr TS: Kâğıtlar uçuşuyor, memur hâlâ mühür basıyor.
  EN FS: Papers flying, clerk still sleeping.
  tr FS: Kâğıtlar uçuşuyor, memur hâlâ uyuyor.
  EN TP: a clerk stamping papers
  tr TP: evrak mühürleyen memur
  EN FP: a hotel desk clerk
  tr FP: otel resepsiyon görevlisi
1000 | climate (noun): the usual weather of a region over many years | loc: iklim | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The climate is getting warmer.
  tr TS: İklim ısınıyor.
  EN FS: The climate is getting colder.
  tr FS: İklim soğuyor.
  EN TP: a changing mountain climate
  tr TP: değişen bir dağ iklimi
  EN FP: a tropical island climate
  tr FP: tropik bir ada iklimi
1001 | clinic (noun): a small medical center you visit without staying | loc: klinik
  EN TS: The clinic is ready for you.
  tr TS: Klinik sana hazır.
  EN FS: The school is ready for you.
  tr FS: Okul sana hazır.
  EN TP: a bright clinic waiting room
  tr TP: aydınlık bir klinik bekleme salonu
  EN FP: a clinic for dogs
  tr FP: köpekler için bir klinik
1003 | cloud (noun): a white or grey mass of water drops up in the sky | loc: bulut
  EN TS: Just one cloud today.
  tr TS: Bugün tek bir bulut var.
  EN FS: Just two clouds today.
  tr FS: Bugün iki bulut var.
  EN TP: one big white cloud
  tr TP: kocaman beyaz tek bulut
  EN FP: a grey rain cloud
  tr FP: gri bir yağmur bulutu
1004 | coach (noun): someone in charge of training an athlete or team | loc: antrenör | translator note: coach-bus pun does not travel
  EN TS: The coach is not whispering.
  tr TS: Antrenör fısıldamıyor.
  EN FS: The coach is not shouting.
  tr FS: Antrenör bağırmıyor.
  EN TP: a coach with a whistle
  tr TP: düdüklü bir antrenör
  EN FP: a coach full of tourists
  tr FP: turistlerle dolu otobüs
1006 | coffee maker (noun): a kitchen machine for brewing hot drinks | loc: kahve makinesi
  EN TS: The coffee maker is too slow.
  tr TS: Kahve makinesi çok yavaş.
  EN FS: The toaster is too slow.
  tr FS: Ekmek kızartma makinesi çok yavaş.
  EN TP: a dripping coffee maker
  tr TP: damlatan bir kahve makinesi
  EN FP: a new coffee maker
  tr FP: yeni bir kahve makinesi
1007 | colleague (noun): a person you work with at your job | loc: iş arkadaşı
  EN TS: Two colleagues are talking.
  tr TS: İki iş arkadaşı konuşuyor.
  EN FS: Two colleagues are eating.
  tr FS: İki iş arkadaşı yemek yiyor.
  EN TP: colleagues at a whiteboard
  tr TP: beyaz tahta başında iş arkadaşları
  EN FP: colleagues at a party
  tr FP: partide iş arkadaşları
1008 | community (noun): people from one area who do things together | loc: topluluk
  EN TS: The community is planting.
  tr TS: Topluluk fidan dikiyor.
  EN FS: The community is painting.
  tr FS: Topluluk boya yapıyor.
  EN TP: a community garden
  tr TP: bir topluluk bahçesi
  EN FP: a gaming community
  tr FP: bir oyuncu topluluğu
1009 | compass (noun): an instrument whose needle shows you north | loc: pusula
  EN TS: The compass is smarter than me.
  tr TS: Pusula benden akıllı.
  EN FS: The old phone is smarter than me.
  tr FS: Eski telefon benden akıllı.
  EN TP: a brass compass in hand
  tr TP: elde pirinç bir pusula
  EN FP: a brass watch in hand
  tr FP: elde pirinç bir saat
1010 | contact (noun): someone you know who can help you at work | loc: bağlantı
  EN TS: She made a useful contact.
  tr TS: İşine yarayacak bir bağlantı kurdu.
  EN FS: She made a useful phone call.
  tr FS: İşine yarayacak bir telefon görüşmesi yaptı.
  EN TP: a new business contact
  tr TP: yeni bir iş bağlantısı
  EN FP: a contact in her phone
  tr FP: rehberinde bir bağlantı
1011 | cook (noun): someone who cooks food | loc: aşçı
  EN TS: This cook needs two spoons!
  tr TS: Bu aşçının iki kaşığa ihtiyacı var!
  EN FS: This cook needs two pots!
  tr FS: Bu aşçının iki tencereye ihtiyacı var!
  EN TP: a cook tasting the food
  tr TP: yemeği tadan bir aşçı
  EN FP: a cook reading a recipe
  tr FP: tarif okuyan bir aşçı
1012 | cough (verb): to push air out of your throat with a loud noise | loc: öksürmek
  EN TS: She is coughing so hard!
  tr TS: Öyle bir öksürüyor ki!
  EN FS: She is laughing so hard!
  tr FS: Öyle bir gülüyor ki!
  EN TP: coughing into the elbow
  tr TP: dirseğe öksürmek
  EN FP: coughing into a tissue
  tr FP: mendile öksürmek
1013 | cousin (noun): the child of your aunt or uncle | loc: kuzen
  EN TS: Two cousins are laughing hard.
  tr TS: İki kuzen katıla katıla gülüyor.
  EN FS: Two cousins are crying hard.
  tr FS: İki kuzen hüngür hüngür ağlıyor.
  EN TP: two cousins on the grass
  tr TP: çimenlerde iki kuzen
  EN FP: two cousins at a table
  tr FP: masada iki kuzen
1015 | calf (noun): the thick muscle at the back of your lower leg | loc: baldır
  EN TS: He is holding his calf.
  tr TS: Baldırını tutuyor.
  EN FS: He is holding his head.
  tr FS: Başını tutuyor.
  EN TP: holding his calf
  tr TP: baldırını tutmak
  EN FP: feeding a calf
  tr FP: bir buzağıyı beslemek
1017 | crosswalk (noun): the striped part of a road for crossing | loc: yaya geçidi
  EN TS: A woman is on the crosswalk.
  tr TS: Yaya geçidinde bir kadın var.
  EN FS: A dog is on the crosswalk.
  tr FS: Yaya geçidinde bir köpek var.
  EN TP: crossing at a crosswalk
  tr TP: yaya geçidinden karşıya geçmek
  EN FP: a crosswalk in the rain
  tr FP: yağmurda bir yaya geçidi
1022 | cushion (noun): a soft pillow-like pad you sit or lean on | loc: minder
  EN TS: This cushion lost the fight.
  tr TS: Bu minder kavgayı kaybetti.
  EN FS: This sofa lost the fight.
  tr FS: Bu kanepe kavgayı kaybetti.
  EN TP: to fluff a cushion
  tr TP: minderi kabartmak
  EN FP: to sit on a cushion
  tr FP: mindere oturmak
1025 | cyclist (noun): a person who rides a bicycle | loc: bisikletçi
  EN TS: That cyclist is super brave.
  tr TS: O bisikletçi aşırı cesur.
  EN FS: That runner is super brave.
  tr FS: O koşucu aşırı cesur.
  EN TP: a cyclist cornering fast
  tr TP: virajı hızla alan bisikletçi
  EN FP: a cyclist in the city
  tr FP: şehirde bir bisikletçi
1026 | czech (adjective): from the country with Prague as its capital | loc: Çek
  EN TS: Czech beer? Yes, please!
  tr TS: Çek birası mı? Evet, lütfen!
  EN FS: Czech wine? Yes, please!
  tr FS: Çek şarabı mı? Evet, lütfen!
  EN TP: a Czech beer hall
  tr TP: bir Çek birahanesi
  EN FP: a Czech wine cellar
  tr FP: bir Çek şarap mahzeni
1028 | czech republic (noun): a small country in central Europe, capital Prague | loc: Çekya
  EN TS: She is in the Czech Republic.
  tr TS: Kadın şu an Çekya'da.
  EN FS: He is in the Czech Republic.
  tr FS: Adam şu an Çekya'da.
  EN TP: sunset in the Czech Republic
  tr TP: Çekya'da gün batımı
  EN FP: snow in the Czech Republic
  tr FP: Çekya'da kar
1030 | daughter (noun): a female child | loc: kız evlat
  EN TS: Flowers from his daughter!
  tr TS: Kız evladından çiçekler!
  EN FS: Flowers from his son!
  tr FS: Oğlundan çiçekler!
  EN TP: flowers from a daughter
  tr TP: kız evlattan çiçekler
  EN FP: flowers for a daughter
  tr FP: kız evlada çiçekler
1033 | desert (noun): a huge dry area of sand where little grows | loc: çöl
  EN TS: The desert has no end!
  tr TS: Çölün sonu yok!
  EN FS: The forest has no end!
  tr FS: Ormanın sonu yok!
  EN TP: camels in the desert
  tr TP: çölde develer
  EN FP: snow in the desert
  tr FP: çölde kar
1035 | destination (noun): the place you are travelling to | loc: varış noktası
  EN TS: He can't see his destination.
  tr TS: Varış noktasını göremiyor.
  EN FS: He can't see the traffic.
  tr FS: Trafiği göremiyor.
  EN TP: far from the destination
  tr TP: varış noktasından çok uzakta
  EN FP: arriving at the destination
  tr FP: varış noktasına ulaşmak
1037 | detergent (noun): a liquid or powder used for washing up | loc: deterjan
  EN TS: Extra detergent, extra foam.
  tr TS: Ekstra deterjan, ekstra köpük.
  EN FS: Extra detergent, no foam.
  tr FS: Ekstra deterjan, sıfır köpük.
  EN TP: pouring washing-up detergent
  tr TP: bulaşık deterjanı dökmek
  EN FP: detergent for the laundry
  tr FP: çamaşır deterjanı
1040 | divorced (adjective): no longer married to your husband or wife | loc: boşanmış
  EN TS: Soon they will be divorced.
  tr TS: Yakında boşanmış olacaklar.
  EN FS: Soon they will be married.
  tr FS: Yakında evli olacaklar.
  EN TP: getting divorced
  tr TP: boşanmak üzere
  EN FP: getting married
  tr FP: evlenmek üzere
1041 | dizziness (noun): the sick feeling that everything is spinning | loc: baş dönmesi
  EN TS: Dizziness hits her hard.
  tr TS: Baş dönmesi kadını fena vurdu.
  EN FS: Dizziness hits him hard.
  tr FS: Baş dönmesi adamı fena vurdu.
  EN TP: a wave of dizziness
  tr TP: ani bir baş dönmesi
  EN FP: dizziness on a boat
  tr FP: teknede baş dönmesi
1043 | arc (noun): a curved line or path shaped like part of a circle | loc: yay
  EN TS: The dolphin's arc gets ten points!
  tr TS: Yunusun çizdiği yay on puan alır!
  EN FS: The seal's arc gets ten points!
  tr FS: Fokun çizdiği yay on puan alır!
  EN TP: a dolphin's leaping arc
  tr TP: yunusun sıçrayış yayı
  EN FP: an arc of a rainbow
  tr FP: gökkuşağının yayı
1048 | dumbbell (noun): a short bar with a weight at each end | loc: dambıl
  EN TS: That dumbbell is super heavy.
  tr TS: O dambıl aşırı ağır.
  EN FS: That dumbbell is super light.
  tr FS: O dambıl aşırı hafif.
  EN TP: curling a heavy dumbbell
  tr TP: ağır dambılla çalışmak
  EN FP: a dumbbell on the floor
  tr FP: yerde bir dambıl
1050 | dutch (adjective): from or connected with the Netherlands | loc: Hollandalı
  EN TS: Tulips on a bike? So Dutch!
  tr TS: Bisiklette laleler? Tam Hollandalı!
  EN FS: Cheese on a bike? So Dutch!
  tr FS: Bisiklette peynir? Tam Hollandalı!
  EN TP: tall Dutch houses
  tr TP: uzun, dar Hollanda evleri
  EN FP: a Dutch cheese market
  tr FP: bir Hollanda peynir pazarı
1057 | employer (noun): a person or company that pays people to work | loc: işveren | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The employer is shaking hands.
  tr TS: İşveren el sıkışıyor.
  EN FS: The employer is washing hands.
  tr FS: İşveren el yıkıyor.
  EN TP: a welcoming employer
  tr TP: güler yüzlü bir işveren
  EN FP: an angry employer
  tr FP: sinirli bir işveren
1064 | everybody (noun): all people, each person in a group | loc: herkes
  EN TS: Everybody is cheering!
  tr TS: Herkes tezahürat yapıyor!
  EN FS: Everybody is sleeping!
  tr FS: Herkes uyuyor!
  EN TP: everybody raising their arms
  tr TP: kolları havada herkes
  EN FP: everybody sitting down
  tr FP: yere oturmuş herkes
1067 | expert (noun): a person with special knowledge or skill | loc: uzman
  EN TS: He is a real watch expert.
  tr TS: Gerçek bir saat uzmanı.
  EN FS: He is a real wine expert.
  tr FS: Gerçek bir şarap uzmanı.
  EN TP: a watch expert
  tr TP: bir saat uzmanı
  EN FP: an expert on TV
  tr FP: televizyonda bir uzman
1069 | eye (noun): the organ of sight | loc: göz
  EN TS: This eye is green-brown.
  tr TS: Bu göz yeşil-kahverengi.
  EN FS: This eye is bright blue.
  tr FS: Bu göz parlak mavi.
  EN TP: an open eye
  tr TP: açık bir göz
  EN FP: a closed eye
  tr FP: kapalı bir göz
1070 | face (noun): the front of the head, from forehead to chin | loc: yüz
  EN TS: She has a laughing face.
  tr TS: Gülen bir yüzü var.
  EN FS: She has a crying face.
  tr FS: Ağlayan bir yüzü var.
  EN TP: a laughing face
  tr TP: gülen bir yüz
  EN FP: a sleeping face
  tr FP: uyuyan bir yüz
1071 | farmer (noun): a person who operates a farm | loc: çiftçi
  EN TS: The farmer is working late.
  tr TS: Çiftçi geç saate kadar çalışıyor.
  EN FS: The farmer is sleeping late.
  tr FS: Çiftçi geç saate kadar uyuyor.
  EN TP: a farmer with a fork
  tr TP: yabalı bir çiftçi
  EN FP: a farmer with a cow
  tr FP: inekli bir çiftçi
1072 | fellow (noun): a man; a friendly informal word for a guy | loc: adam
  EN TS: These two fellows are so happy.
  tr TS: Bu iki adam çok mutlu.
  EN FS: These two fellows are so angry.
  tr FS: Bu iki adam çok sinirli.
  EN TP: two fellows shaking hands
  tr TP: el sıkışan iki adam
  EN FP: a fellow student waving
  tr FP: el sallayan bir okul arkadaşı
1073 | female (adjective): being a woman or a girl | loc: kadın
  EN TS: The female climber is flying!
  tr TS: Kadın tırmanıcı uçuyor!
  EN FS: The male climber is flying!
  tr FS: Erkek tırmanıcı uçuyor!
  EN TP: a female climber
  tr TP: kadın bir tırmanıcı
  EN FP: a female runner
  tr FP: kadın bir koşucu
1074 | fever (noun): a high body temperature when you are ill | loc: ateş
  EN TS: He is checking her fever.
  tr TS: Ateşine bakıyor.
  EN FS: He is checking her phone.
  tr FS: Telefonuna bakıyor.
  EN TP: checking her fever
  tr TP: ateşini ölçmek
  EN FP: checking her pulse
  tr FP: nabzını ölçmek
1076 | finger (noun): any of the long parts on your hand, not the thumb | loc: parmak
  EN TS: A finger is touching a drop.
  tr TS: Bir parmak bir damlaya dokunuyor.
  EN FS: A finger is touching a bee.
  tr FS: Bir parmak bir arıya dokunuyor.
  EN TP: a finger touching a drop
  tr TP: damlaya dokunan parmak
  EN FP: a finger near a bee
  tr FP: arının yanında bir parmak
1078 | firefighter (noun): a person whose job is putting out fires | loc: itfaiyeci | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The firefighter is on duty.
  tr TS: İtfaiyeci görev başında.
  EN FS: The firefighter is on holiday.
  tr FS: İtfaiyeci tatilde.
  EN TP: a firefighter with a hose
  tr TP: hortumlu bir itfaiyeci
  EN FP: a firefighter with a cat
  tr FP: kedili bir itfaiyeci
1079 | first aid (noun): quick help given to someone hurt or ill | loc: ilk yardım
  EN TS: He is giving first aid.
  tr TS: İlk yardım yapıyor.
  EN FS: He is giving directions.
  tr FS: Yol tarif ediyor.
  EN TP: an open first aid kit
  tr TP: açık bir ilk yardım çantası
  EN FP: a first aid course
  tr FP: bir ilk yardım kursu
1082 | fisherman (noun): a person who catches fish as a job | loc: balıkçı
  EN TS: The fisherman caught a lot!
  tr TS: Balıkçı bir sürü balık tuttu!
  EN FS: The fisherman caught nothing!
  tr FS: Balıkçı hiçbir şey tutamadı!
  EN TP: a fisherman with a net
  tr TP: ağlı bir balıkçı
  EN FP: a fisherman with a rod
  tr FP: oltalı bir balıkçı
1084 | flight (noun): a journey traveling by air in a plane | loc: uçuş | translator note: flight-of-stairs pun does not travel
  EN TS: The flight is just starting.
  tr TS: Uçuş şimdi başlıyor.
  EN FS: The flight is just landing.
  tr FS: Uçuş şimdi bitiyor.
  EN TP: a flight after takeoff
  tr TP: kalkıştan sonra bir uçuş
  EN FP: a flight of stairs
  tr FP: inişe geçen bir uçuş
1085 | floor (noun): the flat inside surface of a room you walk on | loc: zemin
  EN TS: She is mopping a wooden floor.
  tr TS: Ahşap zemini paspaslıyor.
  EN FS: She is mopping a stone floor.
  tr FS: Taş zemini paspaslıyor.
  EN TP: a wide wooden floor
  tr TP: geniş ahşap bir zemin
  EN FP: the first floor
  tr FP: zemin kat
1088 | foot (noun): the part of the leg below the ankle | loc: ayak
  EN TS: A bare foot is in the grass.
  tr TS: Çimenlerde çıplak bir ayak.
  EN FS: A bare foot is in the snow.
  tr FS: Karda çıplak bir ayak.
  EN TP: a bare foot in grass
  tr TP: çimende çıplak ayak
  EN FP: a foot in a sock
  tr FP: çorap giymiş bir ayak
1093 | fracture (noun): a break or crack in a bone | loc: kırık
  EN TS: There is a fracture in the leg.
  tr TS: Bacakta bir kırık var.
  EN FS: There is a fracture in the arm.
  tr FS: Kolda bir kırık var.
  EN TP: a leg bone fracture
  tr TP: bacak kemiğinde kırık
  EN FP: a wrist bone fracture
  tr FP: bilek kemiğinde kırık
1096 | gallery (noun): a room where art is shown to the public | loc: galeri
  EN TS: She is in a white gallery.
  tr TS: Beyaz bir galeride.
  EN FS: She is in a white kitchen.
  tr FS: Beyaz bir mutfakta.
  EN TP: walking through a gallery
  tr TP: galeride dolaşmak
  EN FP: walking through a shop
  tr FP: bir dükkânda dolaşmak
1097 | garage (noun): a building where a car is kept | loc: garaj
  EN TS: She is closing the garage.
  tr TS: Garajı kapatıyor.
  EN FS: She is closing the window.
  tr FS: Pencereyi kapatıyor.
  EN TP: closing the garage door
  tr TP: garaj kapısını kapatmak
  EN FP: opening the garage door
  tr FP: garaj kapısını açmak
1100 | gardener (noun): a person who looks after a garden | loc: bahçıvan
  EN TS: The gardener is cutting roses.
  tr TS: Bahçıvan gülleri kesiyor.
  EN FS: The gardener is cutting grass.
  tr FS: Bahçıvan çimleri kesiyor.
  EN TP: a gardener with roses
  tr TP: güllü bir bahçıvan
  EN FP: a gardener with a mower
  tr FP: çim makineli bir bahçıvan
1104 | gentleman (noun): a polite, well-mannered man | loc: centilmen
  EN TS: What a gentleman!
  tr TS: Ne centilmen ama!
  EN FS: What a lady!
  tr FS: Ne hanımefendi ama!
  EN TP: a gentleman tipping his hat
  tr TP: şapkasını kaldıran centilmen
  EN FP: a gentleman closing the door
  tr FP: kapıyı kapatan bir centilmen
1107 | girlfriend (noun): a young woman you are dating | loc: kız arkadaş
  EN TS: He is hugging his girlfriend.
  tr TS: Kız arkadaşına sarılıyor.
  EN FS: He is carrying his girlfriend.
  tr FS: Kız arkadaşını taşıyor.
  EN TP: hugging his girlfriend
  tr TP: kız arkadaşına sarılmak
  EN FP: a girlfriend on the phone
  tr FP: telefonda bir kız arkadaş
